



















SEC.gov | SEC: Tech Company Misled Investors About Key Product


















      Skip to main content
    









 Search SEC.gov     

Company Filings | More Search Options










U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission









Show — Main navigation
Hide — Main navigation


About


What We Do


Commissioners


Securities Laws


SEC Docket


Reports and Publications


Careers


Contact




Divisions


Corporation Finance


Enforcement


Investment Management


Economic and Risk Analysis


Trading and Markets


National Exam Program


All Divisions and Offices




Enforcement


Litigation Releases


Administrative Proceedings


Opinions and Adjudicatory Orders


Accounting and Auditing


Trading Suspensions


How Investigations Work


Administrative Law Judges




Regulation


Rulemaking Index


Proposed Rules


Final Rules


Interim Final Temporary Rules


Other Orders and Notices


Self-Regulatory Organizations


Staff Interpretations




Education


Investor.gov


Check Out a Broker or Adviser


Investor Alerts and Bulletins


Fast Answers


File a Tip or Complaint


Publications




Filings


EDGAR Search Tools


Company Filing Search


How to Search EDGAR


Requesting Public Documents


Forms List


Information for Filers


About EDGAR




News


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speeches


Testimony


Spotlight Topics


What's New


Upcoming Events


Webcasts


SEC Videos


Media Gallery






















U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission


Divisions


Enforcement


Regulation


Education


Filings


Newsroom




Newsroom


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speehes


Testimony




RSS Feeds


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speeches


Testimony




Social Media


@SEC_News


SEC Channel


SEC Photostream









Search SEC.gov



 



Company Filings | More Search Options














          Press Release
        










































SEC: Tech Company Misled Investors About Key Product
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
          2016-45
        

          Washington D.C.,           March 9, 2016—
        
The Securities and Exchange Commission today announced that a developer of technologies for touchscreen devices has agreed to pay $750,000 to settle charges that it misled investors about the production status and sales agreements for a key product.
Two former company executives face related charges in an SEC complaint filed today in U.S. District Court for the Southern District of Texas.  The SEC entered into a deferred prosecution agreement with the company’s former chairman of the board, who has agreed to cooperate and be barred from serving as an officer and director for five years.
 
The SEC alleges that Uni-Pixel Inc. began publicly touting sales of a touchscreen sensor product supposedly in speedy high-volume commercial production when in fact only a few samples had been manually completed.  The misrepresentations caused Uni-Pixel’s stock price to more than double, enabling then-CEO Reed Killion and then-CFO Jeffrey Tomz to make more than $2 million in personal profits from selling their own shares of company stock.  Killion and Tomz allegedly knew the company’s statements were untrue and Uni-Pixel’s manufacturing process was still incapable of mass producing commercial quantities of sensors.
 
“We allege that Uni-Pixel and top executives portrayed a company whose technology had arrived when in truth it was still in the developmental stage,” said Shamoil T. Shipchandler, Director of the SEC’s Fort Worth Regional Office.  “Tech companies and their officers must be honest with investors about the state of their products and cannot portray them as something they are not.”
 
According to the SEC’s complaint:

Uni-Pixel announced “multi-million dollar” sales agreements in 2012 and 2013 that highlighted potential revenues but omitted material conditions the company had to meet to actually receive those revenues.
Uni-Pixel announced in April 2013 that its high-volume production line was “qualified and production ready” and its capacity “started at fifty moving to hundreds and then thousands over the next several months.”  At the time, Uni-Pixel had yet to produce any functional sensors through its high-speed process.
Uni-Pixel issued a press release in November 2013 touting a “purchase order” for its sensors that expected to ship an initial “commercial run” of sensors by year-end.  The company concealed that the order was for a mere $10 worth of sensors for the customer to review as samples.

 
Without admitting or denying the SEC’s charges, Uni-Pixel consented to entry of a final judgment permanently enjoining it from violating Section 17(a) of the Securities Act of 1933 and Sections 10(b), 13(a), and 13(b) of the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 as well as Rules 10b-5, 12b-20, 13a-1, 13a-11, and 13a-13.  The settlement is subject to court approval.  The SEC’s litigation continues against Killion and Tomz.
 
The deferred prosecution agreement with former board chairman Bernard T. Marren alleges that he became aware that information in Uni-Pixel’s press releases was inaccurate but failed to ensure that the company corrected the releases.  The agreement requires him to cooperate with the SEC’s continuing case while complying with certain undertakings in order to avoid civil charges against him. 
 
The SEC’s investigation was conducted by David Whipple, Carol Hahn, and David King, and the case was supervised by Jessica Magee in the SEC’s Fort Worth Regional Office.  The SEC’s litigation will be led by Matt Gulde.

###





Related Materials

Complaint - Uni-Pixel, Killion, Tomz
Deferred Prosecution Agreement - Marren














STAY CONNECTED
1 Twitter 2 Facebook 3RSS 4YouTube
5 Flickr  6LinkedIn 7 Pinterest 8 Email Updates 

































































Our Best Investing Ideas | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Our Best Investing IdeasSears Holdings And ESL Investments: Berkshire Hathaway In Broad DaylightEditors' Pick • SHLD• Today, 9:23 AM • Breeze Block Capital•29 CommentsIteris: Free Option On The Growth Of Autonomous VehiclesEditors' Pick • ITI• Today, 5:00 AM • Laughing Water Capital•2 CommentsCarvana: Looking Under The HoodEditors' Pick • CVNA• Yesterday, 4:37 PM • Pluto Research•7 CommentsFEMSA Plugging Away With Its Empire-BuildingEditors' Pick • FMX• Yesterday, 1:41 PM • Stephen Simpson, CFAShould Investors Continue To Shop At QVC Group?Editors' Pick • QVCA• Yesterday, 12:11 PM • The Boyar Value Group•4 CommentsPandora A/S: The Quintessential GARP StockEditors' Pick • PNDZF, PNDZY, PANDY• Yesterday, 10:00 AM • Joakim Bull Jespersen•5 CommentsCanopy Growth Poised To Dominate The Canadian Marijuana MarketEditors' Pick • TWMJF• Yesterday, 9:43 AM • Jesse Donovan•36 CommentsNorthern Dynasty Minerals: Enough With The Bearish PropagandaEditors' Pick • NAK• Yesterday, 9:03 AM • Joshua Bartlett•29 CommentsThe Finish Line Remains A Value TrapEditors' Pick • FINL• Yesterday, 8:55 AM • Vince Martin•3 CommentsDrill Baby Drill: Bri-Chem Earnings Preview And Forecast UpdateEditors' Pick • BRYFF• Yesterday, 6:48 AM • Darren McCammon•8 CommentsSix Flags Could Lose 25% Of Customers To New Park In MeadowlandsEditors' Pick • SIX• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:30 AM • ManBearChicken•1 CommentChip Companies Will Be Key Beneficiaries Of iPhone 8 Release - Mott Capital Management's Mike Kramer's Idea Of The MonthEditors' Pick • SWKS, AVGO• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:42 AM • Mott Capital Management•2 CommentsSynacor: Hidden Gem With 77% Upside Trading At 4x EBITDAEditors' Pick • SYNC• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:00 AM • ACM Research Team•16 CommentsLet's Look Long Term After Amazon's Earnings MissEditors' Pick • AMZN• Mon, Jul. 31, 11:03 AM • Jeremy Blum•46 CommentsLloyds: Focus On What MattersEditors' Pick • LYG• Mon, Jul. 31, 10:42 AM • Renaissance Research•28 CommentsPRO Weekly Digest: Inside The Mind Of A Short Seller With The Friendly BearEditors' Pick • HMCBF, GHL• Sun, Jul. 30, 7:30 AM • SA PRO Editors•14 CommentsShentel Update: Positive Catalysts Offer Multiple Ways To WinEditors' Pick • SHEN• Sat, Jul. 29, 7:58 AM • John Zhang•3 CommentsPeeling Back The Label On Boston Beer's Q2 Earnings Surprise - Not As Heady As It First AppearsEditors' Pick • SAM• Sat, Jul. 29, 7:30 AM • Lord Baltimore•13 CommentsSAP: The Right Choices Lead To The Right OutcomesEditors' Pick • SAP• Fri, Jul. 28, 12:46 PM • Bert Hochfeld•6 CommentsThe Skies Are Clear For OMABEditors' Pick • OMAB• Fri, Jul. 28, 11:37 AM • Ian Bezek•16 CommentsAimia's Senior Secured Note: 8.5% Yield With Assets Supporting 100% RecoveryEditors' Pick • GAPFF• Fri, Jul. 28, 9:58 AM • Jason Li•18 CommentsFoxconn's American Dream: Wisconsin Shells Out $3 Billion To Hon Hai Precision IndustryEditors' Pick • HNHAF• Fri, Jul. 28, 9:54 AM • Ramon Vredeling•26 CommentsGlaxoSmithKline: Doing An AstraZeneca (And A Reckitt Benckiser)?Editors' Pick • GSK• Fri, Jul. 28, 8:46 AM • Dividend Drive•12 CommentsNETGEAR's Q2 Good Enough To Support A Higher MultipleEditors' Pick • NTGR• Fri, Jul. 28, 8:15 AM • Vince Martin•2 CommentsStock Exchange: Reading Into Retail MovesEditors' Pick • AVGO, LB, RH• Fri, Jul. 28, 6:46 AM • Jeff Miller•10 CommentsCapstone: Pending Catalyst + High Growth, No Debt, Deep Value StockEditors' Pick • CAPC• Thu, Jul. 27, 3:05 PM • Intelligent Walker•8 CommentsDorel Industries Inc. - Turnaround Unlikely To Happen Any Time SoonEditors' Pick • DIIBF• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:11 PM • Shahid Manzoor, CFANexstar Media Group: 18% Free Cash Flow Yield And Significant Upside As Broadcaster Sentiment ImprovesEditors' Pick • NXST• Thu, Jul. 27, 1:28 PM • Soldier of Fortune•3 CommentsActivist Investor Is Catalyst To Unlock Significant Value At Edgewater TechnologyEditors' Pick • EDGW• Thu, Jul. 27, 1:05 PM • Jim RoumellWoori Bank: Newly Privatized, Undervalued, And Hitting On All CylindersEditors' Pick • WF• Thu, Jul. 27, 1:01 PM • Heath White•3 CommentsLiquidity Services Is Out Of Favor, Overlooked, Misunderstood And UndervaluedEditors' Pick • LQDT• Thu, Jul. 27, 12:55 PM • Jim Roumell•8 CommentsPVH Corp.: Make American Fashion Great Again (A La Calvin Klein And Tommy Hilfiger)Editors' Pick • PVH• Thu, Jul. 27, 11:04 AM • Goddess Diogenes•6 CommentsInvitae Set For Growth - Bret Jensen's Idea Of The MonthEditors' Pick • NVTA• Thu, Jul. 27, 6:57 AM • Bret Jensen•26 CommentsGazprom: Russia's Corporate DiamondEditors' Pick • OGZPY• Wed, Jul. 26, 4:04 PM • Dennis Viliardos•29 CommentsAfter 2 Years In The Doghouse, Box Is Poised To Break Past Its $20 IPO HurdleEditors' Pick • BOX• Wed, Jul. 26, 3:53 PM • Gary Alexander•4 CommentsZion Oil & Gas - Drilling Dry Holes Til $0; Will Bankruptcy Court Or Extreme Dilution Get Them There First?Editors' Pick • ZN• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:30 AM • Fuzzy Panda Shorts•46 CommentsTT Electronics: A Case Study Of Management TurnaroundEditors' Pick • TTGPF• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:43 AM • Simeon RusanovIPG Photonics' Laser Technology - Mark Hibben's Idea Of The MonthEditors' Pick • IPGP• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:23 PM • Mark Hibben•7 CommentsPhillips 66: Get Ready For An Upside Breakout On A Strong Q2 ReportEditors' Pick • PSX• Tue, Jul. 25, 3:35 PM • Michael Fitzsimmons•43 CommentsLong Dillard's On Potential For 'Infinity Squeeze'Editors' Pick • DDS• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:40 AM • Richard Pearson•77 CommentsLook Beyond The Storm Clouds Hovering Over Silicon MotionEditors' Pick • SIMO• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:14 PM • Jenks Jumps•9 CommentsNew Theme Park Puts Six Flags At RiskEditors' Pick • SIX• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:52 PM • ManBearChicken•5 CommentsPRO Weekly Digest: Identifying Market Mispricings With Yale BockEditors' Pick • FH, MARK• Sun, Jul. 23, 7:30 AM • SA PRO Editors•14 CommentsQEP Resources: Imminent And Longer Term CatalystsEditors' Pick • QEP• Sat, Jul. 22, 11:39 AM • Richard Zeits•57 CommentsIndependent News & Media Plc - Has The World Really Ended?Editors' Pick • INNZF• Sat, Jul. 22, 11:14 AM • Philip Ryan•10 CommentsEssential Energy Services: Too Cheap To IgnoreEditors' Pick • EEYUF• Sat, Jul. 22, 9:52 AM • Michael Munro•13 CommentsThe Long Case For Sands ChinaEditors' Pick • SCHYF, SCHYY• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Catalyst Trader•1 CommentThe Short Case For WelbiltEditors' Pick • WBT• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Rational Short Investor•4 CommentsThe Long Case For LiLACEditors' Pick • LILA• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Stephen Saroki•2 CommentsThe Short Case For Singapore Press HoldingsEditors' Pick • SGPRY, SGPRF• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Warren Chan•2 CommentsHow Teekay Offshore Partners L.P. Got Into This MessEditors' Pick • TOO• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:21 PM • Long Player•175 CommentsDump Cincinnati Bell On 2 Terrible AcquisitionsEditors' Pick • CBB, HCOM• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:39 AM • John Zhang•10 CommentsBurberry: Still Undervalued As It Builds Up To A Potentially Improved 2018?Editors' Pick • BURBY• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:00 AM • Dividend Drive•1 CommentPapa Murphy's Holdings: An Overlooked Competitor In A Crowded SpaceEditors' Pick • FRSH• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:19 AM • Dining Stocks Online•14 CommentsStock Exchange: Sizzling Summer Picks In Discretionary SpendingEditors' Pick • COST, PEJ, TSLA• Thu, Jul. 20, 5:57 PM • Jeff Miller•24 CommentsThe Short Case For HubspotEditors' Pick • HUBS• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:00 PM • Short Biased•4 CommentsThe Long Case For AritziaEditors' Pick • ATZAF• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:00 PM • Kara Stessl•5 CommentsMicron And Intel: The AI And Security Play Of The CenturyEditors' Pick • MU• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:13 PM • Stephen Breezy•395 CommentsViewRay: Initiate Strong Sell On Questionable Backlog, Product Inferiority, And Bankruptcy ConcernsEditors' Pick • VRAY• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:45 AM • Mako Research•138 CommentsA Basket Of Stocks To Play The Impending Clean Energy/EV Boom - Part 1 (Lithium)Editors' Pick • CRECF, EEYMF, PILBF• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:10 AM • FI Fighter•22 CommentsBurlington Stores Looks TemptingEditors' Pick • BURL• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:08 AM • Vince Martin•4 CommentsDundee Precious Metals - Derisked And Deeply UndervaluedEditors' Pick • DPMLF• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:45 AM • Simple Digressions•24 Comments'Everybody's Gotta Eat': Restaurant Stocks In FocusEditors' Pick • BWLD, CMG, MENU• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:30 AM • SA Marketplace•28 CommentsNew Residential Investment Corp. Is Currently Undervalued By 20%Editors' Pick • NRZ• Thu, Jul. 20, 7:30 AM • Scott Kennedy•165 CommentsCato Is An Easy Short, Even At 6x P/EEditors' Pick • CATO• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:32 PM • Vince Martin•8 CommentsTeekay Corp. - J Mintzmyer's Idea Of The MonthEditors' Pick • TK• Wed, Jul. 19, 1:21 PM • J Mintzmyer•115 CommentsBriggs & Stratton: American Icon Trading At A DiscountEditors' Pick • BGG• Wed, Jul. 19, 12:54 PM • Michael Boyd•6 CommentsWhy Google AdSense Is The Heart And Soul Of Alphabet's Advertising EmpireEditors' Pick • GOOG, GOOGL• Wed, Jul. 19, 11:58 AM • Motek Moyen•38 CommentsEnergy Sector - The Last Value PlayEditors' Pick • TS, VREYF, APA• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:58 AM • Andrea Bernasconi•2 CommentsHalcon Resources: A New Player On The Permian Block That Can SurpriseEditors' Pick • HK• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:53 AM • Richard Zeits•48 CommentsWhy Keeping Up With FDA Approvals Could Help Your Stock Portfolio - Slingshot Insights' Joe McCann's Idea Of The MonthEditors' Pick • RDUS• Tue, Jul. 18, 2:55 PM • Slingshot Insights•2 CommentsSAExploration Holdings: An Interesting SpeculationEditors' Pick • SAEX• Tue, Jul. 18, 10:54 AM • Amit Ghate•12 CommentsApplied Optoelectronics: Still A Conviction Long - Strong Execution And Earnings Momentum Means Raising Of EPS Estimates, And Price Target To $125Editors' Pick • AAOI• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:26 AM • Jay Deahna•262 CommentsYes, Vera Bradley Still Is A ShortEditors' Pick • VRA• Tue, Jul. 18, 7:44 AM • Vince Martin•15 CommentsRestoration Hardware Discloses The #1 Controversial Share Buyback Of The YearEditors' Pick • RH• Tue, Jul. 18, 7:30 AM • Ioannis Tsoutsias, CFA•21 Comments123456...158Next Page


Uni-Pixel's Commercialization Runs Into A Brick Wall - Uni-Pixel, Inc. (NASDAQ:UNXL) | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Uni-Pixel's Commercialization Runs Into A Brick WallApr.13.15 | About: Uni-Pixel, Inc. (UNXL) Richard X Roe Long/short equity




SummaryUni-Pixel is about to miss its commercial launch target again - the likely "customer" has no plans to use Uni-Pixel's 23-inch AIO touch sensor.No purchase order for the 7-inch tablet sensor, the prime area of focus last year. Dell is out.Significant discrepancies in Uni-Pixel's production yield charts. No real progress towards commercialization by Uni-Pixel and Kodak in the past two years.Little demand for Uni-Pixel's touch sensors. Direct competitors have 10:1 price advantage, says Intel.Diamond Guard - still a commodity product with poor prospects.A sensor with no customer
Uni-Pixel (NASDAQ:UNXL) intends to launch its first product, an all-in-one (AIO) touch sensor with a 23-inch diagonal sometime this quarter (February call transcript and Needham conference presentation, 9:30). This might be a problem, because the end client is apparently unaware that it would be receiving commercial shipments of such a sensor. Uni-Pixel formally engaged an AIO original equipment manufacturer (OEM) as a development customer in August last year (August call transcript). It was identified as Elo Touch Systems at the Liolios conference in September 2014 by Jeff Hawthorne, Uni-Pixel's CEO (personal communication). According to Elo's customer service, the company does not sell nor has any plans to sell a 23-inch AIO device (see current AIO offerings). The closest comparable product offered by Elo is a 22-inch AIO, with a choice of either resistive or surface-acoustic touch rather than Uni-Pixel's projected capacitive (procap) touch sensor. Uni-Pixel was asked to reconfirm that Elo is still the AIO OEM and explain the size discrepancy between the sensor and Elo's offerings, but the company did not respond.
Elo, owned by a private equity firm, is one of the oldest companies in the touch industry and supplies a variety of touch solutions including touchscreen components, touchmonitors, and AIO touchcomputers, using several touch technologies and targeting digital signage, retail, point-of-sale, hospitality, medical/healthcare IT, industrial, and consumer. However, Elo's business has been in gradual decline due to competition in these mostly mature or low-volume markets. Annual revenues are now down to about $370 million from $413 million in 2011, and the company's debt carries a high risk of default.

Elo has declined to comment on specific questions about the nature of the relationship with Uni-Pixel, citing corporate policy and confidentiality. But Elo's familiarity with Uni-Pixel predates August. Elo has been evaluating the technology at least since the beginning of last year, when, according to Uni-Pixel's CEO, Elo received a functional 15-inch sensor prototype from Uni-Pixel. Uni-Pixel had previously claimed in November 2013 that it had received purchase orders from unnamed customers for a 23-inch AIO sensor and a 15-inch touchmonitor for delivery in Q1 last year, but no product sales ever materialized. There is also a YouTube video posted in May last year showing a test performed on the 15-inch Uni-Pixel touch sensor made for Elo.
Not ready to launch
There are a number of clues that Uni-Pixel is not prepared to ship or even accept an order this quarter. For example, Uni-Pixel is no longer a production-stage company. From 2010 until this year Uni-Pixel had used this label in all its SEC filings, but it is now only in a "pre-production stage," according to the latest 10K filing. The filing also outlines a commercialization roadmap that is considerably less aggressive that the guidance on the February call - production of "viable commercial InTouch touch screens" is targeted within 6-12 months (sometime in late 2015) as supposed to 1-4 months (this quarter).
An AIO integration trial that was initially scheduled for January (Needham conference presentation, 29:00) was not finished, even though samples had been delivered to two module integrators vying for Elo's business (February call transcript). The development customer had not yet picked which one of those module integrators would be tasked with assembling the sensor into a module, and no pricing had been set. Uni-Pixel doesn't even have an updated product datasheet - the one shown on Uni-Pixel's website was last modified in December 2013 (see pdf metadata), and still has spelling errors (for example, "link" instead of "ink"), does not mention the new "proprietary blackening coating" (March corporate presentation, slide 10), and has an important specification discrepancy compared to the latest 10K (line width of "6+/- 1μm" compared to "~6-8 μm"). The company is also missing the critical Windows 8/8.1/10 certification for its sensor, despite working on it since 2013 (personal communication).

Uni-Pixel's Analyst Day in December was promoted as a "unique opportunity" to showcase the company's commercialization readiness, but it was only open to select audience and media were excluded. Even though the event was hosted at a Kodak (NYSE:KODK) facility (and the presentation was authored by Kodak, according to the pdf metadata), Kodak's Investor Relations explained that there were no Kodak invitees and Uni-Pixel was managing all event aspects (personal communication). In the past, Uni-Pixel had been very successful with its factory tours and demos in fooling willing attendees into believing that production was imminent - like the Touch Display Research analyst, convinced that mass production would start in July after an in-fab personal tour and survey of operations in April 2013 (personal communication), or the Cowen & Co analysts, believing in imminent Q4 2013 volume production after a tour in August. In contrast, when Atmel (NASDAQ:ATML) organized a tour of its touch sensor facilities in November 2013, media were welcomed and the company was actually producing commercially because tablet devices using its sensors showed up in stores later that month (personal visit of an Office Depot store).
More telling, Kodak, which is contracted to actually produce the sensors, has not confirmed Uni-Pixel's guidance for a commercial launch this quarter. According to the Manufacturing and supply agreement with Uni-Pixel, Kodak is intimately involved in the business planning and project operations, influencing potential order schedules, pricing, costs, etc. But Kodak claims to be working on tablet sensors, not AIO sensors:
We continue work with Uni-Pixel on building the initial production quantities necessary to support lead customer's assessments in the medium and large display tablet markets. (Kodak March call transcript)
Further commenting on the status of the Uni-Pixel project, Jeff Clarke, Kodak's CEO acknowledged "remaining technical hurdles which have continued to date" and did not mention upcoming commercial revenues. At the same time, he hoped for modest revenue this quarter from commercial shipments by the other touch sensor partner, Kingsbury, a direct Uni-Pixel competitor utilizing a silver-halide technology developed by Kodak. Kodak's CEO also noted that he would not "want to bet on startup businesses in [the 2015] guidance," emphasizing that the revenue and EBITDA contribution from touch would be a "very small number" this year. This was a change from the Kodak August call when he expected that revenues from the touch sensors projects would be "in the tens of millions for the year" (actual commercial revenues from both Uni-Pixel and Kingsbury turned out zero last year). Requests submitted to both Kodak and Uni-Pixel for explanation of the apparent difference in expectations about a product launch this quarter have remained unanswered.

Past promises and management departures
Uni-Pixel has a history of committing to commercialization in an upcoming quarter, and predictably failing to achieve it. For example, in the Q&A at the Liolios conference, about three weeks before the start of Q4 last year, Uni-Pixel's CEO was explicitly asked about a possible delay, but he was adamant that the target for initial revenues remained Q4. As expected, Uni-Pixel did not achieve commercialization and made no shipments during the quarter. Previously, Uni-Pixel's Directors and interim co-CEOs, Carl Yankowski and Bernie Marren, had targeted an initial manufacturing ramp by Q2 last year in a January 2014 press release, with the same effect. Numerous failed commercialization targets during the tenure of Reed Killion, the former CEO, have been documented elsewhere.
A number of notable personnel departures from Uni-Pixel and Kodak in recent months also cast doubt about an imminent product launch. Robert Berg, Uni-Pixel's Senior VP of Sales and Marketing for more than a year, left in June last year to re-unite with his former employer - a surprising move if large sales commissions were just around the corner. Uni-Pixel did not announce his departure, even though he had been listed on the company's management webpage. Daniel Van Ostrand, the Founder and Senior VP of Engineering and R&D, left in September last year after 15 years with the company to "pursue other interests," namely working as "a consultant to the printed electronics industry" (Touch Gesture Motion Conference speaker list), with a website proclaiming to be the "future home of something cool." He also sold all his Uni-Pixel stock in December, on the day the company was hosting its Analyst Day. Martin Kykta, Uni-Pixel's Senior Research Scientist - responsible for developing, improving, and measuring the "flexible electronics to be used in touch sensors" - left in August after seven years with the company to be a full-time President of his own one-man electro-optics consultancy (speaker list). Douglas Edwards, Kodak's head of Functional Printing, who had overseen the touch sensor projects since 2013 left in December after reorganization. The business, under a new name, is now managed on an interim basis.

Tablet sensor flop
In May last year, less than a month after his appointment, Uni-Pixel's CEO announced that "based on new roadmap, technical work streams [had] now focused on development project to produce an initial product for the tablet market." He selected a new product, a 7-inch tablet sensor, because Uni-Pixel's technology "most readily" applied to that size (May call transcript). Previously, the company had worked primarily on notebook and larger size sensors. The company also engaged a new development customer and eventually "received touch and optical performance approval" (Analyst Day presentation, slide 15). The customer was supposed to buy this sensor when the product was "fully ready" (May call transcript), but in October the customer decided not to place an order and instructed Uni-Pixel to start working on another tablet design instead, according to Uni-Pixel. Uni-Pixel's CEO blames the market:
At the time we decided to develop the 7-inch, there was a pretty reasonable market for it. What's happened since is that the 7-inch market has really been going into oversupply, so our customer asked us to focus on 10-inch instead of 7-inch (Needham conference presentation, 32:30)
That explanation makes no sense, for three reasons:
First, the May press release insisted that the "other touch-screen market segments" were to be addressed only after "this initial [7-inch] product launch," yet Uni-Pixel rushed to start work on the AIO program in August and then proceeded with the new 10-inch program in October (March corporate presentation, slide 20), without ever shipping the 7-inch product for revenue.
Second, the development customer's decision not to proceed with the 7-inch sensor should not have affected purchase orders by other interested parties. On the May call, Uni-Pixel had argued that there was a wide selection of candidates lined up as potential development customers for such a sensor.
Third, the weakness in tablet shipments did not suddenly occur in September or October - any oversupply condition should have been evident much earlier. The tablet market was already "crashing" in the summer of last year.

Picture 1: Kodak Manager Mike Smith showing off the 7-inch sensor rejected by the customer (NYT video, 3:40)

In May last year, DisplaySearch, a research outfit often quoted by Uni-Pixel, had already warned that for the first time ever tablet shipments registered a year-over-year decline in April. Yet Uni-Pixel maintained that the tablet market was healthy, with "exceptional growth [underscoring] the magnitude of the initial opportunity Uni-Pixel was pursuing" (May call transcript). Even most recently, on the call last February, the CEO was still describing tablets as a "growing market opportunity," despite tablet display shipments experiencing year-over-year declines of 9% and 24% in January and February, according to WitsView (see table labeled "Shipment" and use Wayback Machine for earlier data).
Huge market, but no order
Every major tablet manufacturer, except Apple, sells and actively develops 7-inch tablets today. These small tablets still command the dominant market share, about 50%, of total unit shipments (DisplaySearch press release). The 7-inch segment has always been extremely competitive and 7-inch white-label tablets have been selling for as low as $50 since last summer. If the customer actually made and sold 7-inch tablets, and if Uni-Pixel's sensors had decent performance and price advantages, the customer should have been even more eager to order the sensors, to counteract the drop in tablet selling price and preserve margins. Moreover, the "patient" customer, as it was portrayed on the February call, should have placed the order early on so it can be the first in line to receive shipments and have a cost advantage against the competition once the market balance were eventually restored.

Picture 2: Singulated 7-inch sensor film sheets and packing label (analyst day video, 4:40)
However, Uni-Pixel and its partner appear more interested in development than actual sales. Uni-Pixel continued to tout its progress with the 7-inch sensor throughout last year, but was short on specifics. In August Uni-Pixel announced the delivery of the first "tens of samples" to the tablet development customer (August call transcript) . On the Analyst Day video recorded at Kodak's facilities, the product is shown as tested and packaged for shipment (see from 3:30 till end) - the sensor does not look very transparent (possibly due to sensor line width not within specifications), wastes too much film (each sensor sheet takes about 2 sqft instead of the optimal 0.4 sqft), and the final verification and packaging process appears too labor intensive. On the August call, the CEO initially stated that the sensor samples had already undergone integration and performance evaluation by the customer, providing "valuable integration yield data and positive feedback on sensor performance." But when asked on the call how many had been actually assembled into modules, the CEO contradicted himself by replying that the customer was still "working on assembling all of them into modules," that is, the integration and evaluation had not been fully completed. Uni-Pixel never disclosed the integration yield achieved by the development customer in that first trial.
As of early November, there was still no indication by management that there had been a problem with obtaining a product order the month before and that the initial 7-inch design had been cast aside. While initial revenues had now been postponed to 2015, the work on the initial tablet design was progressing as usual:

We continue to benefit from the strong relationship with our tablet customer, who understands the challenge of our yield ramp, and remains fully engaged. We continually discuss our progress to ensure our testing methods will result in high integration yields, and we are working with this development customer to plan follow-on integration trials and prototype delivery schedules. (November call transcript)
Slide 15 in the November corporate presentation also reiterated that the company was working the final development of this tablet product." The company waited until the Analyst Day in December to reveal for the first time that a new 10-inch tablet design had been initiated in October instead (Analyst Day presentation, slide 17). The practice of sending samples but never obtaining and fulfilling an actual product order is similar to what transpired in January last year, when it became clear that rather than making the expected product deliveries in late 2013, the company had simply "provided hundreds of samples and demonstration units to key potential customers" but no "commercial production orders were shipped" (January 2013 press release).
Dell is out
Uni-Pixel CEO told investors that the company was working on too many product designs ("SKUs") in early 2014, so he picked the small 7-inch tablet sensor to focus the company's development effort (Needham conference presentation, 08:50 and slide 14). But by doing so, Uni-Pixel effectively reneged on its contract with Dell, which at that time called for another tablet sensor.
In February last year, Jeff Tomz, Uni-Pixel's CFO, had signed an amended "Statement of Work" with Dell that stipulated a specific "conditional" purchase order for a larger, 11-inch, tablet sensor:
at least 1,000 Metal Mesh Sensors to be delivered no later than June 30, 2014 for the purpose of evaluation by Dell.
The sensors were for intended for Dell Venue Pro 11, an 11-inch tablet with a detachable keyboard (a "hybrid") codenamed "Midland," or "another applicable platform." Uni-Pixel did not disclose that order last year and did not deliver on it.

According to the text of the Dell agreement, as amended, the relationship terminated in November last year (no further amendments have been filed). Yet Dell is still listed as a "current partner" in the latest 10K (page 10), and investors are misled that Uni-Pixel "will sell significant quantities of InTouch touch sensors through this relationship." The irony is that, unlike Dell, neither the tablet nor the AIO development customer is mentioned or described in the 10K. It is also interesting that Dell inserted an anti-bribery and anti-corruption clause in the February amendment, which raises questions about the circumstances surrounding the original agreement signed in late 2012, specifically why exactly did Uni-Pixel get $5 million with no apparent obligation in return. Uni-Pixel did not respond when asked to comment on the status of the Dell agreement and the failure to disclose the termination.
Uni-Pixel has made no progress under the agreement with its ecosystem partner Intel (NASDAQ:INTC) either. Uni-Pixel got another $5 million two years ago to cover equipment purchases and has not yet recognized it as revenue - it is still a current liability on the balance sheet. That agreement is scheduled to expire March next year, and it is not entirely clear what would happen then, as all interim deadlines were effectively removed by an amendment a year ago.
Yield charts don't match
Uni-Pixel has a problem the production yields it has reported recently. Production yield is an important determinant of the manufacturing cost for touch sensors, and the company's yield data are conflicting. There are three charts showing recent yields measured at the roll-to-roll tester in the manufacturing facility operated by Kodak. Kodak is supposed to maintain the yield database (Manufacturing and supply agreement, sections 5.1 and 6.3), and has been operating the pilot line since the end of August (Needham conference presentation, 23:20). The chart on slide 20 in the Analyst Day presentation has the yields of individual runs for the period August 20, 2014 - November 19, 2014. The chart on slide 21 in the Needham conference presentation applies to the period August 20, 2014 - December 12, 2014. The chart on slide 22 in the March corporate presentation covers only the AIO testing and does not show individual runs but what appears to be either an average yield or just one run, for each day in the span of three weeks, or 14 consecutive workdays, sometime in late February to early March.

The first two charts both contain the period August 20, 2014 - November 19, 2014, but the graphs do not match. While the charts don't shows values on the Y (yield) axis, the highest yield on the second chart is about 85% (Needham conference presentation, 31:20), and the X axis is assumed to cross the Y axis at 0%. Using those values as calibration points, the data from the first two charts have been extracted with a digitizer tool and plotted on Picture 3.
Picture 3: Uni-Pixel's production yield graphs, side by side
The data extraction process has an estimated precision of +/-1%, with the limitation that it cannot identify more than three runs per day and cannot distinguish more than one run for a given yield on the same. Overall, the resulting plot resembles the original lines closely, including the linear fit lines. The "Analyst Day" line simply does not match the "Needham" line in the overlapping period and the discrepancies appear random, ranging from none on days like September 23 to about 37% on September 5. Only about 45% of the identified runs have similar yields .
When confronted about the mismatch between the charts from the two slides, Uni-Pixel's Investor Relations first argued that the data were the same in both charts for the common period. In a follow-up, Uni-Pixel's CEO reiterated that the data were the same and sourced from the same database, saying that had "no idea why [Microsoft PowerPoint] graphed it slightly different," and then refused further explanation. Kodak did not reply to a request for comment on the obvious data discrepancies.
There are two additional issues with these charts that complicate interpretation of the yield data for individual runs and the yield trend over time.

First, reported yields overstate the true ratio of good sensors to total manufactured sensors in the rolls throughout the period. According to Uni-Pixel's CEO, the roll-to-roll testing equipment has been unable to catch some of the defects identified as "microscratching," and the company had "some escapes through [its] integration partners" (Needham conference presentation, 22:40). In other words, the company has been shipping sensors that registered as good but were in fact defective. As of mid March, Uni-Pixel was still working on "final test optimization" (March corporate presentation, slide 20) with a third-party equipment vendor trying to add a new inspection method (Needham conference presentation, 22:40).
Second, there is no information about sensor size, line resolution, and sensor design from the data points, and those all affect the yield. For example, there were at least three different sensor sizes that Uni-Pixel was trying to produce during the period - the 7-inch tablet sensors (until October, presumably), the 10-inch tablet sensors (since October), and the 23-inch AIO sensors (since August), each with different yield behavior. So even if yield appears to have increased in November, there is no way to tell from the chart whether there was an actual improvement or whether Kodak was simply manufacturing more of the higher-yielding sensors. Similarly, making a sensor with 6-micron-wide conductive lines is much more difficult than making a sensor with a 10- or 15-micron-wide lines, and Uni-Pixel had offered a price list for all of these resolutions in the past (Intel agreement, section 5.1). Finally, the sensor design itself affects yield - for example, sensors with redundancies in the sensor mesh might have a higher yield but at the expense of diminished sensor transparency.
Poor production yields
Picture 4 shows monthly summaries calculated using extracted data from both charts - the median and the average yields with standard deviation bars. The number of observations by month were 6, 16, 13, 6 and 12 from the Needham chart, and 6, 15, 12, and 5 from the Analyst Day chart.

Picture 4: Summary yield statistics show little progress
There is no apparent upward trend in yields in Picture 4, contrary to management interpretation. For example, Uni-Pixel stated in early November:
We continue to make progress increasing our average yield as we apply the knowledge gained from and improvements made to the pilot production line. (November press release)
However, the statistics in Picture 4 and the individual data points from Picture 3 show that average yield was actually decreasing in September and October, right until the day before the press release. Confirming the lack of improvement, Daniel Van Ostrand cited manufacturing yield as one of the two challenges of metal mesh sensors in late October, about a month after leaving Uni-Pixel (Touch Gesture Motion Conference presentation, slide 5). The positively sloped linear fit lines in Picture 3 are not appropriate statistical indicators of an improving yield trend. By extending the trend in both directions, the lines inevitably cross 0% and 100%, implying negative yields prior to some point in the past and yields over 100% after some point in the future, yet yield, by definition, is bounded between 0% and 100%.
In early January, the CEO reiterated that the trend was one of "increasing yield" even though yields were "a little choppy" (Needham conference presentation, 23:20). He was also encouraged that "from November through middle of December [Uni-Pixel] started to see more consistent yield capability," that is, reduced yield variability. True, yields suddenly jumped and variability dropped in November, but then in December yields were back down to the September levels and yield variability worsened sharply. The Analyst Day attendees would probably be surprised to learn that the live pilot production runs they observed resulted in yields of 1%,4%, and 63% (or 22%, on average) on that day based on the extracted data.

The CEO's explanation for the yield variability is not credible. According to him, it is due to three factors - microscratching, trial-and-error engineering experiments, and then the "holidays in the latter part of December" (Needham conference presentation, 23:30). But microscratching cannot be the culprit - by Uni-Pixel's own admission, the company's automatic roll-to-roll tester is still unable to detect microscratching defects and properly measure yield, so even if all the sensors in a particular roll were affected by this defect, they would still be all counted as good, and the yield shown on the chart for the test run would be 100% instead of 0%. With respect to trial-end-error being a factor, it is puzzling that Uni-Pixel would run drastic experiments on the pilot production line operated by Kodak, when there were 2 printing presses and at least 4 plating lines in the facility and another facility in Texas was supposed to be dedicated to R&D and process development (November call transcript and Needham conference presentation, 33:30). Finally, the data end in mid December, so there simply aren't any yield observations from the latter part of December, or the "holidays," in the charts.
The poor yields and high yield variability are easier to explain by fundamental flaws in Uni-Pixel's manufacturing process and equipment. The company and Kodak are attempting to reliably deposit microscopic continuous patterns on both sides of a moving flexible substrate using equipment designed to print bottle labels (only 50-micron registration, see Intel agreement, exhibit A). They then aim to reliably metalize those patterns using an inherently unstable chemical process. Mike Smith, a Kodak Operations Manager with Uni-Pixel's project, tries to explain the two-part sensor-making process while holding the rejected 7-inch tablet sensor, apparently oblivious to the irony that the process and its economics may not be fully thought out:
Putting glue on a piece of construction paper and sprinkling sparklies on top is very similar to what goes on here. The glue is our ink. The sparklies in this part of the process is the metal. It's a little bit more high-tech than that, but, fundamentally, that's what goes on. (NYT video, 3:50)

The only other competitor that tried to use a process involving creating a catalytic pattern followed by electroless plating was Atmel, in partnership with CIT (OTCPK:CCEGF) (CAR.UK) (Uni-Pixel has been a CIT licensee in the past). Atmel was ahead of Uni-Pixel by at least two years in both the patterning and metalizing processes, because it switched early on from printing to a finer process, lithography, and always used touchless plating. Atmel started shipping commercial volumes in 2013, achieved little last year, and finally gave up and announced a shutdown of the sensor business in early February. The other two metal mesh competitors that have had some success so far, MNtech (095500:Korea) and O-film (002456:China), do not use a separate metalizing process but rely instead on a simple printing process followed by a brief curing period. Cima Nanotech's self-forming metal mesh has also shown promise.
On the February call, Uni-Pixel's CEO did not present new production yield data but only discussed integration yield instead. The new yield chart in Uni-Pixel's March corporate presentation has been completely redesigned, not an unexpected development given that the two previous yield charts do not show Uni-Pixel and Kodak "making the right progress" or "understanding how to reduce variability and increase the yield" (Needham conference presentation, 24:25). There is no continuity from the previous two charts - the periods do not overlap; the graph has just one point per day instead of individual runs; no actual yield values are given; and the chart covers only the AIO sensor yield. One could speculate that each major interval on the Y axis corresponds to 10%, implying that the average and median yield in the period were about 40%, with estimated standard deviation of about 6%. That would be an improvement from the results in December, but the yield is still below the target of 50% "net yield" (Kodak agreement, section 7.7). If production yields were that much better than last year's, Uni-Pixel would have put values on the Y axis in this new chart. Moreover, measured yields still overstate actual yields, as the microscratching test has not been finalized.

Integration yield just as problematic
Uni-Pixel's story about integration yield is also confusing. Integration, or back-end, yield is the yield experienced by the module integrator while assembling a sensor received from Uni-Pixel into a complete touch module, and is an important determinant of the competitiveness of Uni-Pixel's product.
Uni-Pixel's CEO reported the achievement of "integration yields in the high 80 percentile with [the] tablet development partner." (February press release), but in the Q&A on the call he implied that he meant high-80% integration yields (subsequently confirmed by the March corporate presentation, page 21). The CEO, a former inspection system applications engineer, should have been aware that percentile and percentage have very different meanings. A percentile is defined as a value on a scale of 100 that indicates the percent (%) of a distribution that is equal to or below it. For example, if an integration trial with Uni-Pixel sensors resulted in a yield in the 85 percentile, that means that among all the yield observations recorded by the module integrator from trials in the past, less than 15% were higher than the yield from the trial with Uni-Pixel sensors. Again, as an example, if the integration yields observed in the past have been uniformly distributed between 0% and 80%, a yield of 68% would be in the 85% percentile.
He also claimed on the call that "ITO film yields are generally lower than [the high 80%s]," implying that Uni-Pixel and its development customer should have been "very pleased." That would come as a surprise to the leading module integrators because their yields were already 80-95% by mid 2013 (KDB industry report, page 33). Module making has been a very competitive, cost-driven business since late 2013, with gross margins often close to just 10% even at 95% yield (CS industry report, page 2), meaning selling at about zero gross margin, that is, at cost, when operating at 85% yield.
Also, according to Uni-Pixel's CEO, this was just one "integration trial" and one "sample," which makes no sense because one trial can only be associated with just one integration yield - the ratio of the good modules divided by the total number of modules assembled from the sample of sensors used during the trial. Also, the result could not have been "a consistent 80% over that sample," as he further elaborated, but just one yield data point of 80%, or actually a high 80%, if it were just one trial. On the call he also described the integration trial as "large," with "a large number of sensors," while in January had only mentioned "low volume sampling of InTouch sensors to customers for integration" (Needham conference presentation, slide 26). In March, Kodak's CEO characterized the recent trails as "low volume" but did describe the integration yields as "favorable." (Kodak March call transcript). There has been no word from either CEO about what was the integration yield of the tens of 7-inch tablet sensors shipped in July last year - they were all supposed to be assembled into modules (August call transcript).

No progress in the past two years
When comparing recent production yields with past disclosures, the conclusion is that there has been no measurable progress towards commercialization - yields remains roughly in the same range as in early 2013. Robert Petcavich, Uni-Pixel's Chief Technology Officer (CTO), together with the former CEO, told investors in March 2013 that expected yields would be "85% and continuing to improve" once commercial production were to start within a month or two on the already operational printing/plating lines (Roth conference presentation, 23:21 and WFG investor call, 20:00 ). Those yields match the highest measured yields in November and December (Picture 3), and commercial production is again just about to start, according to management.
Despite repeated reports of progress and breakthroughs in the past year, measured yields did not improve. In early 2013 actual yields were 20%-40% on average and the manufacturing process was unreliable - not much different from the average yield of about 30% and variability of about 30% in the period August - December 2014 (Picture 4). A former Uni-Pixel employee, a confidential witness for the plaintiffs in the class auction lawsuit that Uni-Pixel has agreed to settle, has explained the causes of the low yield. He testified that until his departure in spring 2013, Uni-Pixel was always changing the production process, "sometimes daily or even twice in a single day," because the company "could never get it down pat." Frequent problems included:

a. Machine jams and improper "plating" on the press, requiring manual adjustment;
b. Even when jams and plating problems were corrected, product that looked good was later reported by the client to have a low yield - indeed, yields were only 20-40%;
c. While larger print samples could be reliably made which were uniform and fully conductive, the smaller the pattern size, the more likely it was to be non-uniform and have microscopic breaks;
d. The goal of shrinking the pattern size down to the desired level of thinness because everyone knew that the lines were visible and that a Moire effect was evident in the larger print remained elusive regardless of materials used;
e. Additional testing to catch problems before shipping samples to clients was problematic - as too much testing and handling could cause broken lines and destroy the product; and
f. Management had "overpromised" product on delivery schedules that could not be met and needed to be pushed out. The team tweaked the product to reduce errors as the deadline would approach; once the product finally looked very good, the first production sample would fail. (Case 4:13-cv-01649, 28, page 22)


All the factors that affected manufacturing yield in early 2013 likely remain - for example, improving the sensor optical quality probably still breaks the electrical performance, and speeding up production probably still results in an increased number of defects.
Three pilot announcements
The "achieved technical breakthrough in roll-to-roll plating process," announced as "tremendous progress" in June last year was supposed to bring manufacturing from a "lab-based development" to a new level - a fully-functional roll-to-roll pilot production line. Yet the next step, the start of actual production and transition to commercialization, was not reached and yields did not improve, which indicates that there was little substance behind the advertised advancement. The announcement, scheduled earlier that month after Intel was informed that production had not started, now looks suspiciously like a trick to support the stock price ahead of last August's shareholder meeting and divert investor attention from several developments that month - the departure of Robert Berg, the liquidation of the entire stake by the largest shareholder of the company, Destrier Capital (compare holdings in the proxy with 13F filing), and the failure to deliver the 1,000 sensors to Dell.
A review of history shows that this is not the first time Uni-Pixel has declared a fully-functional roll-to-roll pilot production success. According to past statements by Uni-Pixel's CTO, roll-to-roll pilot production was first achieved more than three years ago, in March 2011, and then again in February 2013.
In March 2011, the CTO gave an update about the just completed roll-to-roll pilot production runs (March 2011 call, 10:00):
We have run pilot production materials at very high rates on a prototype line which has been the R&D proving ground for our large-scale continuous flow manufacturing process... I will be showing ... next week ... the first roll-to-roll UniBoss pilot production films. [UniBoss is simply the "old" brand name of Uni-Pixel's touch sensors, now InTouch]

Actual production and commercial shipments were to follow shortly:
After introducing the UniBoss solution... in May [2010], we have focused on UniBoss development efforts, on continuous improvement of materials, the processes by which we achieve the highly transparent conductive lines and spaces. We expect the next phase of UniBoss prototypes to allow OEMs and their supply chain to qualify the product for one or more commercial opportunities. Concurrently, we are making plans to put in place high speed production equipment... We anticipate the equipment will be installed and up and running by July of this year... We have already begun installing proprietary manufacturing equipment that can support up to a half a million sqft of film production per eight hour shift. [over $100 million in product value at prevailing prices]
Then again, nearly two years later, he described a fully-functional production line, ready to commence production in the coming quarter:
So, now the line is actually running, we're actually running roll-to-roll material off the line now. We do have a recipe for product that we are bringing off the lines as we speak even this afternoon and we don't see any road blocks to meeting or exceeding that 60,000 units per month in April. We're adding couple of pieces of equipment that are expected to be delivered in a couple of weeks that will amplify that production throughput and that we think the one we know today, there is not going to be hiccup or issues with the scale up, at least for 60,000 units. (February 2013 call transcript)
Uni-Pixel managed to make and ship a 50 samples in April that year, but they were not accepted by Dell, and actual production never started.
Touchless, like in 2008
Another recent milestone, touchless plating, is supposed to be a major innovative step towards commercialization, but is in fact an 8-year old idea. The "engineering proof-of-concept" announced on the February call involved "converting parts of the web transport system on one of the plating lines from a mechanical roller system to 'touchless' system," with further work directed towards a complete upgrade to touchless web handling. The non-contact system modification is supposed to bring actual yield closer in line with yield measured at the automatic roll-to-roll tester, particularly for the tablet sensors.

Chemcut, Uni-Pixel's plating equipment vendor, and, Atotech, the plating chemistry vendor, are puzzled by the announcement (personal communication). The InTouch rolls are supposed to be double-sided, and Chemcut's engineers do not currently know of a way to convert their plating line into touchless on both sides (only touchless on one side has been done). An Atotech engineer believes that Uni-Pixel and Kodak did modify one of the lines by simply taking most of the mechanical rollers out, but it is not a complete touchless system. He thinks they are also working on another line to make it truly touchless. His guess is that they are trying a similar configuration to the one used by Cemko, an UK plating equipment vendor, utilizing fluidic pressure to keep the film "up the surface."
Picture 5: Cemko's touchless plating system, year 2008

Atotech has partnered with both Chemcut and Cemko, but the engineer recommend Cemko for a touchless roll-to-roll film system. Cemko's system, picture above, is very compact and was specifically developed for delicate printed electronics applications in collaboration with CIT in 2008. In contrast, Chemcut's systems are designed primarily for plating rugged printed circuit boards (PCBs). Atmel, in partnership with CIT, had been using Cemko's touchless system in volume production of touch sensors for two years until exiting the business in February, so it can't be a coincidence that Uni-Pixel came up with the touchless milestone just three weeks later. A Cemko line would have also prevented defects caused by those bubbles stuck on the film and visible on the Analyst Day video (2:05).
Kodak is of little help
Kodak's technology was expected "to enable Uni-Pixel to scale production to meet accelerating demand" and begin commercial production in 2013 (Kodak April 2013 press release). But the only tangible benefits to Uni-Pixel from Kodak's manufacturing agreement appear to be a facility with environmental permits for the plating operation (see the "harmful liquids" warning, Analyst Day video, 2:01) and Kodak sharing half of the project operating expenses (Kodak agreement, section 7.13). One other unexpected benefit is that Kodak might be authoring Uni-Pixel's investor presentations (see Author pdf metadata in March corporate presentation)

Kodak management seem to know surprisingly little about touch sensors. Kodak's CEO joined the company around the same time Uni-Pixel's CEO did and, like him, also lives across the country. He is on record saying things like:
The touch screen sensor business is very large - I reference a $30 billion annual size to this market - and we are very excited to be in it at production quality, at production levels now. (Kodak November call transcript).
His view is shared by Terry Taber, Kodak's CTO, who in July 2013 expected that the market would grow to over $30 billion in 2-3 years and that demand for Kodak's sensors would be "extremely high" (Democrat & Chromicle, July 2013, first video, 1:39). However, the touch sensor market is nowhere close to $30 billion. Even Uni-Pixel's inflated numbers, sourced from what are back-of-the envelope estimates by DisplaySearch rather than actual transactional data, show the total addressable procap touch sensor market at about $5-6 billion (March corporate presentation, slide 6). The real addressable market is just a small fraction of that value, and while it is still growing in units, it is already flat to declining in dollars due to continuous sensor cost reductions.
Moreover, neither Uni-Pixel nor Kingsbury, Kodak's other partner and direct competitor to Uni-Pixel, have reached production quality or are ready for production. Kingsbury is also targeting this quarter for initial commercial shipments, but the goal used to be Q4 and then last quarter, similar to Uni-Pixel. Kodak's original touch sensor film project based on PEDOT technology, announced in 2011, was expected to result in better performing and cheaper touch sensors but never achieved significant sales.
Kodak's CEO also believes that indium is a rare metal and is an expensive part of the bill of materials of touchscreen devices (WhatTheyThink video, 1:58). But indium is not a rare metal - it is as abundant as cadmium or silver. Its price is currently close to the price of silver, about $550/kg, and the actual indium metal content in a regular ITO touch sensor amounts to a few milligrams, or less than a penny. The cost of manufacturing of touch sensors is primarily determined by the yield and length of the production chain, and partially by the pattern forming technology, not by the initial raw materials used, which Kodak would have known, if it actually had made any touch sensors.

Kodak's CEO is probably not entirely to blame, as the arrangements with Uni-Pixel and Kingsbury and the entire sensor market strategy were conceived and set during the bankruptcy reorganization preceding his tenure. For example, the agreement with Uni-Pixel was likely put together rather hastily - it stipulates on page 5 that "the revenue and profit will be allocated between the Parties according to Section 6 of this Agreement," but section 6 covers only facility utilization while the revenues and profits are addressed in a subsequent section.
If the goal were to gain a significant market share and if Kodak had a good grasp of the market and costs, it makes little economic sense to support three different touch sensor technologies - copper, silver halide, and PEDOT. Kodak should have first tried to pick a cost winner among those and made sure it would be competitive with the sensors already manufactured by the module integrators. Instead, these three technologies compete directly with each other, confusing the potential customers. For example, neither Kodak nor Uni-Pixel have explained why J Touch, which Kodak and Kingsbury announced as a customer early last year, does not work with Uni-Pixel and is not interested in Uni-Pixel's copper-based metal mesh technology, when both Uni-Pixel and Kingsbury are trying to make the same touch sensors. And Kingsbury and Kodak have been unable to explain why J Touch has never mentioned Kingsbury, Kodak, or any silver-halide touch sensors since the initial press release, nor has it ordered any commercial quantities so far, but had stated in that press release that it "offers touch panel solutions utilizing copper-based metal mesh," from 1.6 to 23 inches.
It seems that Kodak now intends to keep the touch sensor projects running as long as possible in order to keep investors excited about the imaginary "growth opportunity" (Kodak March call transcript). Kodak operates in mostly dull, mature, and declining markets, with shrinking revenues and negative operating margins, so it is tempting for management to try to spark a bit of hope (NYT article). But that could also backfire. For example, last August a Kodak account manager uploaded a marketing video touting the company's expertise in functional printing and touch sensors, not realizing that the video showed a defective Uni-Pixel sensor under a microscope (see snapshot below). After an inquiry to Kodak, the video quickly disappeared from his YouTube account without explanation.

Picture 6: Defective sensor in a Kodak video (Kodak U, 5:50) 
Redundant sensors
Uni-Pixel is overstating the potential benefits of its touch sensors. For example, Uni-Pixel claims that its sensors are "suitable for all size applications" (March corporate presentation, slide 10). However, Uni-Pixel's sensors are unsuitable for smartphones, the most important application in the touch market in terms of both units and dollars. The company still uses pictures of phones to illustrate its sensors and their "numerous benefits" (slide 5 and slide 13) and the CEO had touted the "significant market potential of Uni-Pixel's touch sensors for smartphones" (April press release). However, since the Liolios conference, smartphones are no longer included in Uni-Pixel's addressable market (Liolios conference presentation, slides 6 and 7). The CEO admitted in the Q&A:
We don't believe that our product is really applicable to the phone market. Again, we are talking about placing the metal mesh on top of the display. The pixel size on phones is much smaller, so that metal mesh is going to cover up more of the phone pixel and that creates a noise pattern, display degradation. Also the border, the bezel pitch, is much tighter on phones - we can't address that today.
With reference to the addressable market, Uni-Pixel falsely states that the existing touch technology faces unmet customer needs (March corporate presentation, slide 9). While there is no perfect touch technology, the slide itself illustrates that current ITO-based and embedded touch sensors meet all customer needs, at least the needs that matter.
Picture 7: Existing touch technology meets customer needs

For example, to show that ITO does not scale and is not appropriate for larger displays, Uni-Pixel is actually using the picture of a huge 82-inch ITO-based touch-enabled AIO developed by Perceptive Pixel, now part of Microsoft (NASDAQ:MSFT), and unveiled in 2011. Even a 24-inch sensor is beyond Uni-Pixel's capabilities, according to the footnote on the first page of its datasheet.
Uni-Pixel also claims that existing touch technology is inadequate in terms of touch response speed and accuracy and pen enablement. But the picture in this section is of Dell Venue Pro 8 tablet being used with a stylus. That popular device actually has a regular ITO touch sensor.
To illustrate that current touch sensors are fickle, with poor signal-to-noise ratio, the company attached a chart of a touch event detected by a regular display without any touch sensor in it that actually shows a very high signal-to-noise ratio. The chart comes from a study that demonstrated how touch can be detected with the circuitry already present in a regular non-touch LCD display by doing some signal processing on the faint noise transmitted through the power line. In effect, the study is an endorsement for embedded sensors which also rely on circuitry in the display itself and are rapidly gaining share this year in high-volume applications as they are virtually free.
Finally, Uni-Pixel is using a picture of three simple resistive, not procap, ITO-based modules to argue that the prevailing ITO touch technology is too costly. However, resistive sensors and modules have all but disappeared from high volume applications due to inherent functional drawbacks. They are also no longer the lowest-cost ITO touch sensor option.
There are similar issues with slide 13 supposed to illustrate the specific functional advantages of Uni-Pixel's sensors (Picture 8).
Picture 8: Uni-Pixel sensors are either unsuitable or have no functional advantages

The top two photos on the right show the LG (066570:Korea) G Flex phone and its bendable display - this was the first flexible phone, released commercially in 2013. That is, curved designs and flexible touch sensors are already taken care of with existing technology. Moreover, Uni-Pixel's sensors are unsuitable for smartphones, by the CEO's own admission. The third picture is of a 55-inch touchdisplay with infrared, not procap, module made by Elo and is from a blog post discussing poor usability of multitouch on large displays.
The other functional advantages in the list on the left in Picture 8 are either irrelevant or misleading. It is true that metal mesh and other non-ITO technologies can have lower resistance, but that is no longer an issue with modern touch controllers which enable fast touch response even in large formats. Many ITO sensors for smartphones and tablets are also one-sided, and ITO sensors such as OGS or certain embedded sensors don't require any film. Uni-Pixel's technology has poor optics and inaccurate color rendition, because the mesh partially covers certain pixels, creating color noise and moiré - that is one of the reasons why it is not suitable for smartphones and high-resolution tablets and notebooks.
The prospect of selling below cost
A product with no significant functional advantages is a tough sell in the touch sensor business. In contrast to an active market for some touch modules, the market for touch sensors is virtually non-existent. Very few touch sensors are actually sold and purchased, and most are produced internally by module integrators or display manufacturers, who are also the potential customers. So unless there is some temporary shortage, the sensor selling price needs to be well below the customer's current internal cost of manufacturing to compensate for the sensor making capacity that would become idle. And then the sensor's production cost needs to be even lower to allow for a viable product with a sustainable gross margin. That is why there are no successful pure-play sensor manufacturers today. The companies that have attempted commercial production in the so-called ITO-alternative space have typically been module manufacturers making the new sensors themselves, like O-film or TPK (3673:Taiwan), or could bundle the sensor with some other component, such as a touch controller, like Atmel, or optical film, like MNtech, or could sustain the losses, like Fujifilm (4901:Japan). The current mainstream capacitive touch solutions - various discrete ITO-based glass or film sensors made by module integrators and various embedded sensors (in-cell, on-cell, or hybrid) made by display manufacturers - are good enough and remain cost competitive with the alternatives offered today, such as metal mesh (copper, silver, silver halide), silver nanowires, CNT, PEDOT and graphene.

Despite the planned commercial launch this quarter, Uni-Pixel has been reluctant to discuss specific pricing and costs, but its poor production yields guarantee that the company is not cost competitive. It will have to sell at negative gross margin to generate volume demand for its sensors and "drive touch adoption and improve profitability down the product chain" (March corporate presentation, slide 13).
The last time Uni-Pixel provided extensive details about its internal model for average selling price and costs was on the November 2012 call, in the middle of its price negotiations with Intel and Dell and during the peak of touch module shortages. The company revealed $20-$22/sqft price for its touch sensors at preferred price, a 30% discount vs "street pricing" of $31-$32/sqft. Its cost of manufacturing could be modeled at about $10/sqft, implied by a gross margin "over 50%." That model price and cost structure was similar to Atmel's, and Atmel got out of the touch sensor business mainly due to price pressures, having initially hoped for $100 million annual revenues. In November 2012, the actual cost of manufacturing of some competitors might have been around $50/sqft indeed, and Uni-Pixel was implying that cost of regular touch sensors at the time was as high as $70-$100/sqft, derived from $40-$60 for 10.1-inch module and 30%-50% discount with Uni-Pixel's sensor. By June 2014, sensors costs had collapsed, due to yield improvements and pricing pressures in the touch module market. Uni-Pixel's own sensors were now described only as "competitive" (June call transcript), implying they were modeled at a slightly lower price than the cost of "regular" touch sensors. The company's estimate for those came down to $12-$20/sqft, that is about 1/5th of the original range in late 2012, but still higher than the actual costs at the module integrators or display manufacturers.
Intel does not believe Uni-Pixel has a "market-leading cost structure" (March corporate presentation, slide 12). In late 2014, SID published a review article authored by Intel's Senior Touch Technologist in which he stated that his estimate for metal mesh sensor pricing by the end of 2015 would be around $1/sqft ("$10-12/m2"). Uni-Pixel's CEO stumbled badly when asked to comment about the $1/sqft prospect in the Q&A at the Needham conference presentation (33:55):


Q: Intel is now saying that metal mesh will be $1/sqft by the end of the year. Can you compete with that?
A: I don't know how they arrive at $1/sqft. I mean, we are in discussions ...
Q: Well they are looking at actual manufacturers of metal mesh and those are telling them that metal mesh will be $1/sqft.
A: Yeah, so all the surveys that we have done is that touch sensor films or the touch sensors themselves are about $12-$15/m2, so yeah, it is getting close to about $1/sqft.
Q: Right, but this is patterned... metal mesh, it is not just unpatterned film. What we are taking about is $1/sqft of an actual touch sensor.
A: Yup, of the sensor itself, not the module, correct.
Q: And you think basically that you can compete with that.
A: Definitely.

But in a follow-up, Uni-Pixel's Investor Relations replied that the CEO misspoke and he actually meant $15/sqft not $12-$15/m2. The CEO himself later came up with $18/sqft, or $5.5 price for a 10.1-inch sensor, citing DisplaySearch, a stunning retreat from being definitely competitive with the $1/sqft number. If Uni-Pixel were in close contact with Intel, and did "monitor and feed the relationship" as claimed (June call transcript), Uni-Pixel's CEO should not have been caught by surprise by the view of Intel's touch expert on pricing prospects in the touch sensor business. The stated belief in the latest 10K that Uni-Pixel will "sell significant quantities of InTouch touch sensors through [Intel's] relationship" now sounds preposterous.
It is really too late for Uni-Pixel to attempt commercial sales in the tablet and even small notebook sensor segments, as the cost of discrete procap sensors has dropped and embedded sensors have started gaining share. At about 50% yield, which is Uni-Pixel's current commercialization target (August call transcript), the manufacturing cost will be above $10/sqft, probably even $15/sqft and over, but the actual manufacturing cost of regular procap sensors can be as low as $5/sqft right now. Embedded sensors are proliferating, not just in smartphones but also in larger screen sizes. Synaptics (NASDAQ:SYNA) estimates (page 6) that in-cell sensor technology, for example, can eliminate up to 60% of the touch module cost. Since a regular procap sensor is typically 10%-25% of the overall module cost, depending on configuration (KDB industry report, pages 37-38), an embedded sensor is effectively free. For example, if the sensor cost is simply taken out of a $10 regular "discrete" touch module, the module cost will come down to about $8, but a similar in-cell "module" can be as low as $4. BOE is even offering free touch modules for smartphones, selling touch displays at the same price as that of non-touch displays of identical size and quality.

AIO touch sensors are not free yet, but severe competition has eroded potential profitability even in that small segment. Uni-Pixel is apparently relying on faulty market research when it claims (March corporate presentation, slide 7) that AIO sensors "represent the fastest growing and most profitable segment with $235 million [addressable market] by 2018." While the projected procap unit volumes are likely already overstated, the real problem with the dollar value and the entire chart on the right is the implied sensor "pricing." For example, using segment dollar sizes extracted from the chart with a digitizer tool, and dividing them by the procap sensor units projected by DisplaySearch (November 2014 Touch Panel Market, slide 9), the average AIO procap sensor cost come to about $40 in 2013, $50 ($40/sqft?) in 2014 , and $70 in 2015 and 2016. Those numbers are unrealistic and inflated for three reasons.
First, a $70 AIO sensor cost in 2016 is inconsistent with the $65 number from the module ASP chart for 2016 (March corporate presentation, slide 8), also sourced from DisplaySearch, because it implies that a sensor would be more expensive than a module which contains a sensor, a flexible cable, a controller, cover glass, and adhesives.
Second, the persistent overcapacity in the industry simply does not support increasing sensor costs, and the overcapacity may actually be worsening. Touch notebooks, not just tablets, are weakening. Compal (2324:Taiwan), one of the two largest contract manufacturers of notebooks, is predicting (see also this) that traditional touch-enabled notebooks will start disappearing by the end of the year, while the 2-in-1 tablet/notebook hybrids are unlikely to pick up the slack. As embedded sensors have now entered the notebook segment, even more discrete sensor manufacturing capacity could spill into the AIO segment. AUO (NYSE:AUO), for example, expects to start mass production of in-cell touch panels for notebooks in the current quarter.
Third, the AIO procap sensor market is very limited due to ergonomic issues with touch on large vertical surfaces ("gorilla arm") and due to simple aesthetics (distracting fingerprints and smudges). Unit shipments are estimated at 2-3 million in 2014 and 2015 (November 2014 Touch Panel Market, slide 9). Almost all ITO-alternative competitors (over 100) are now targeting this segment and pressuring prices down. The companies with other technologies that still hold a significant share in the AIO segment, such as optical and infrared, are also trying to defend their turf.

A coat that is hard to sell
In February, Uni-Pixel announced that it had received its "first purchase order for two [55-gallon] barrels of Diamond Guard resin" to be used in a film coating trial, and had already shipped it (February call transcript). According to Uni-Pixel, the resin shipment generated revenue, but the selling price was not set. As of mid March, commercial shipments were expected to start this quarter (March corporate presentation, slide 29).
The "film manufacturing partner" for Diamond Guard listed in the latest 10K is Carestream, but the following language found in the 2013 10K has been removed:
They will support the manufacturing, warehousing and sales of our protective cover film line of products.
Last year Carestream announced its own "proprietary hardcoat formulation." It is supposed to provide scratch and abrasion resistance targeting essentially all Uni-Pixel's intended markets, such as touchscreens, flat panels, membrane switches, decorative graphics and white boards (March corporate presentation, slide 24). When Carestream was asked recently to explain how this product is not a direct competitor to Diamond Guard, the company only replied that the product targets "different markets entirely" and declined to comment on its relationship with Uni-Pixel. Incidentally, Carestream has also been competing with Uni-Pixel in touch sensors, developing a silver-nanowires solution since 2010.
The "sale" announced in February is not Uni-Pixel's first shipment of Diamond Guard for film applications. In Q2 2012, Uni-Pixel reported that it had
fulfilled a number of purchase orders for Diamond Guard Hard Coat film submitted by major electronic OEMs, ODMs and film converters that are advancing product designs which take advantage of Diamond Guard's unique characteristics.
At the time, Uni-Pixel was marketing hardcoated film, as supposed to just the resin, but, like the recent shipment, those were only "test level runs," as explained on the call. Uni-Pixel recognized about $70,000 in revenues that quarter, but those were no product revenues as no cost of sales was reported.

Earlier, in March 2012, the company had signed an agreement with Carestream for the manufacture and distribution of the coated film and had received the first purchase orders for "test piloting purposes." In July, the company announced "production-level qualification" and capacity of over 100 million sqft/year to support large-scale volume production, corresponding to over $150 million in potential revenues (Roth conference presentation, 3:50). Full-size purchase orders and shipments were expected later that quarter, but they never happened - the excuse offered by the CTO and the former CEO was that a hardcoat was a difficult "technical sale," with customers having complex specifications and integration steps, and that the ramp of Diamond Guard would take time. (November 2012 call, 30:15).
Based on the sparse technical and marketing information about Diamond Guard available publicly, it is an acrylic-based hardcoat resin. That makes it a commodity product, readily available from numerous suppliers. Companies like Sartomer (AKE:France) and Allnex, for example, are happy to supply the components and suggest specific formulations that would best fit the customer requirements. For example, both companies suggest various options with a urethane acrylate base for about $100 a gallon for a transparent UV-curable acrylic hardcoat resin for coating PET film to 6H pencil hardness (personal communication). So the value of Uni-Pixel's Diamond Guard shipment in January should be about $11,000, and if the product is ever sold commercially, it would be at cost or a single-digit gross margin at best.
Many vendors, including companies with marketing prowess and large customer base, have attempted to push cover glass replacements with much better specs than Diamond Guard since at least 2012, but have achieved little commercial success in mainstream applications. For example, an overview of the 2013 Finetech Japan expo (slide 9) lists products from four different exhibitors, including cover sheets with 9H hardness by Dai Nippon Printing Co., Ltd. (7912:Japan) (press release) and Nippon Steel Sumitomo Metals Chemistry (datasheet), both announced in 2012. Separately, MNtech has had its 4H TAF in the window of the S View novelty cover case for certain Samsung (005930:Korea) phones since 2013, but it is a low-volume application.

Uni-Pixel's own documents show why there is little demand for Diamond Guard, even if sold at cost. For example, Picture 9 annotates the slide that supposedly illustrates three types of applications for the resin (March corporate presentation, slide 24):
Picture 9: Diamond Guard is unnecessary
However, metadata in the pictures reveals that the broken glass of the iPhone 4 shown there was actually replaced by glass (the picture comes from ads for glass replacement services). Glass was used because hardcoated plastic simply cannot provide enough strength and support to protect the display of a mobile device, and is too easily scratched by a pen, coins, keys, sand, and even glass. Apple would have switched to a plastic screen for the iPhone 5 released in late 2012, if Diamond Guard or similar hardcoats were any good compared to glass.
The picture that supposedly illustrates protective films and case parts was taken in 2012 - again, demand must be low since there have been no commercial sales of Diamond Guard in the past three years.
The last picture is of an AkzoNobel (AKZA:Netherlands) product, a polyvinylidene difluoride cast film, aimed at replacing mechanically brushed decorative metals, and has nothing to do with the acrylic Diamond Guard.
Similarly, the picture on the next slide, slide 25, is of a Samsung Galaxy phone taken in 2011, and Samsung still uses glass for all of its mobile devices. None of the arguments listed on the slide about the benefits of Diamond Guard and the "need for elimination of glass in cover lens assembly" are valid. Corning (NYSE:GLW)'s Gorilla Glass and similar products offered by other glass companies are very difficult to shatter, are inexpensive, can be very thin and light, protect the display extremely well, and are actually scratch resistant, unlike plastic surfaces coated with Diamond Guard.

Slide 26 is also misleading. For example, it states that the minimum effective thickness for glass is 0.5mm as compared to 0.12mm for Diamond Guard film. That is simply not true. Willow Glass, Corning's flexible but tough glass, is available in 0.1mm thickness. Schott's ultra-thin glass can be as thin as 0.025mm.
The cash runs out in 2016
"We're definitely on the right track," Uni-Pixel's CEO told investors, just ahead of the upcoming shareholder meeting in August last year. He meant production revenues in 2014, but that marker was not reached. It has been the same track that leads to persistent cash drain of about $3 million a quarter and repeated commercialization delays. The company is about to miss its product launch target again, has failed to receive an order for last year's tablet sensor, and has a hard time measuring and improving yields. Its technology is now redundant due to declining cost and increased performance of regular ITO and embedded touch solutions. Even if the company were to start volume shipments eventually, it will have to sell at a loss. As the trend persists, the cash should run out by the end of next year, or even sooner, if management comes up with an excuse to accelerate capital spending, such as building or buying a touchless system. A new equity round may be in the works, despite repeated denials by the company.
Uni-Pixel's story told by management is fiction, but successive CEOs, with the approval of the Board of Directors, have been able to repeat it for years and raise millions because there have been no adverse consequences. The recent class action lawsuit is about to be settled for a fraction of the losses incurred by investors who participated in the 2013 equity financing. The SEC has been investigating since 2013, sending at least three letters to the company recently, and the only tangible outcome so far has been a filing of a 10K/A amendment for 2013, which finally disclosed information that should have been disclosed in 2012 and 2013, but there have been no penalties. Uni-Pixel's Directors must feel pretty relaxed if Carl Yankowski, who said that touch sensors are made of indium titanium oxide and promised commercial revenues to ramp in Q2 last year (February 2013 call), is still eager to go on CNBC and pitch the company as disruptive and innovative. Kodak, the manufacturing partner with declining revenues and ongoing losses, is still playing along and paying half of the operating expenses while running Uni-Pixel's inadequate equipment and half-baked processes just so it can pretend that it is developing breakthrough technologies.

Uni-Pixel's equity investors face a dilemma. The best course of action for the long term should be to liquidate the company immediately and distribute the cash to shareholders, before it is gone. But short term trumps long term - the market cap is about $90 million right now compared to cash level of about $20 million, fueled by promises of imminent commercial launches and vast addressable markets. So the incentive is to wait it out as long as possible, trading around bouts of excitement, short covering, and portfolio rebalancing effects, and hoping to get out before the eventual collapse of the stock price. Such a course of action suits management and the Board perfectly as they will continue to receive salaries and stock, until the cash is gone.
Disclosure: The author is short UNXL, KODK. 
The author wrote this article themselves, and it expresses their own opinions. The author is not receiving compensation for it (other than from Seeking Alpha). The author has no business relationship with any company whose stock is mentioned in this article.
Editor's Note: This article covers one or more stocks trading at less than $1 per share and/or with less than a $100 million market cap. Please be aware of the risks associated with these stocks.About this article:ExpandAuthor payment: $35 + $0.01/page view. Authors of PRO articles receive a minimum guaranteed payment of $150-500.Tagged: Investing Ideas, Short Ideas, Technology, Diversified ElectronicsWant to share your opinion on this article? Add a comment.Disagree with this article? Submit your own.To report a factual error in this article, click hereFollow Richard X Roe and get email alerts


Technology Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Technology StocksFitbit: Sell The RallyFIT• Today, 11:35 AM • Bill Maurer•1 CommentFitbit: Encouraging Narrative, Results Still MixedFIT• Today, 11:26 AM • D.M. Martins ResearchIron Mountain: Take A Closer Look Before Going For The DividendIRM• Today, 11:00 AM • Jonathan Weber•3 CommentsApplied Optoelectronics: China Fears Loom Before EarningsAAOI• Today, 10:57 AM • Kumquat Research•23 CommentsFrontier Communications: Much Better Than Market FearsFTR• Today, 10:57 AM • Stone Fox Capital•7 CommentsSilicon Motion: Slyly Taking AdvantageSIMO• Today, 10:54 AM • Jenks Jumps•1 CommentMicron: A Sudden Drop Flags TroubleMU• Today, 10:53 AM • The Structure Of Price•27 CommentsGTT Communications, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGTT• Today, 10:31 AM • SA TranscriptsFitbit- The Tides Are TurningFIT• Today, 9:22 AM • Jeffrey Himelson•13 CommentsFrontier: Don't Be FooledFTR• Today, 9:00 AM • Business Quant•16 CommentsAT&T Nosedives Over 2%... What Gives?T• Today, 8:00 AM • David Alton Clark•49 CommentsWhy Amazon Will Not Kill This BusinessAMZN• Today, 5:45 AM • Vitaliy Katsenelson, CFA•15 CommentsTeradata - When Analyst Disdain Can Be A Good ThingTDC• Today, 5:06 AM • Bert Hochfeld•5 CommentsIteris: Free Option On The Growth Of Autonomous VehiclesEditors' Pick • ITI• Today, 5:00 AM • Laughing Water Capital•2 CommentsCorning: Uncertainty Created The Drop And An OpportunityGLW• Today, 4:51 AM • Jacob Urban•7 CommentsFollowing The Surprising PureFunds Dismissal, Here's How The Cybersecurity ETF Will ChangeHACK• Today, 1:11 AM • Dave DierkingCastlight Health, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCSLT• Yesterday, 9:17 PM • SA TranscriptsFormFactor, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFORM• Yesterday, 7:45 PM • SA TranscriptsSprint: A Good Time To Buy?S• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•82 Comments3 Reasons To Hold Onto XperiXPER• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Focus Equity•3 CommentsiPass Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIPAS• Yesterday, 7:12 PM • SA TranscriptsBrooks Automation, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBRKS• Yesterday, 6:49 PM • SA TranscriptsFirst Solar And The Gift Of U.S. Market DominionFSLR• Yesterday, 6:03 PM • Robert Dydo•13 CommentsItron, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesITRI• Yesterday, 5:41 PM • SA TranscriptsWhat You Need To Know As Hortonworks Announces Q2 ResultsHDP• Yesterday, 5:17 PM • Virginia Backaitis•6 CommentsBlackBerry: A Mature StartupBBRY• Yesterday, 5:14 PM • Renars G•83 CommentsCommerceHub, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCHUBA• Yesterday, 5:09 PM • SA TranscriptsRealPage 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRP• Yesterday, 4:38 PM • SA TranscriptsBuying Opportunity For KEMET Bulls After Preliminary Earnings VolatilityKEM• Yesterday, 4:01 PM • Pantho Investments•3 CommentsApple's Investment Theme Has Not ChangedAAPL• Yesterday, 3:34 PM • George Kesarios•22 CommentsKDDI To Acquire SORACOM For IoT CommunicationsKDDIY• Yesterday, 3:18 PM • Donovan JonesCognex Is A Terrific Company But Already Fully ValuedCGNX• Yesterday, 2:57 PM • Shareholders Unite•18 CommentsApple's Quarterly Results: No Pause HereAAPL• Yesterday, 2:24 PM • Edison Investment Research•11 CommentsBox Runup And Insider Selling May Indicate Full ValuationBOX• Yesterday, 2:13 PM • Donovan Jones•6 CommentsCyberArk - A Summer Low Buy Before A Fall High?CYBR• Yesterday, 2:07 PM • Accendo Markets•2 CommentsIntel: Cloud Continues Strong Momentum, But Shareholders Will Not Be RewardedMBLY, NVDA• Yesterday, 1:45 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•10 CommentsAMD: The Good, The Bad, The VegaAMD• Yesterday, 12:58 PM • Austin Craig•228 CommentsRadisys: Time To Buy?RSYS• Yesterday, 12:26 PM • Mark Gomes•13 CommentsAMD: Threadripper Will DominateAMD• Yesterday, 12:18 PM • Kumquat Research•58 CommentsApple Delivering On Need To Complement iPhone SalesAAPL• Yesterday, 12:09 PM • Gary Bourgeault•21 CommentsNavient Acquires Duncan Solutions For Transportation Revenue ManagementNAVI• Yesterday, 11:35 AM • Donovan Jones•6 CommentsSemiconductor Equipment Stocks - What's Going On?AMAT, LRCX, KLAC• Yesterday, 11:13 AM • Robert Castellano•10 CommentsSilicon Motion Technology Is A BuySIMO• Yesterday, 10:57 AM • Shareholders Unite•3 CommentsFrontier: Get Out While You CanFTR• Yesterday, 10:35 AM • Quad 7 Capital•85 CommentsGarmin Ltd. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGRMN• Yesterday, 10:33 AM • SA TranscriptsS&P Index Decision Punishes Snap, But Helps Ordinary InvestorsSNAP• Yesterday, 10:19 AM • Ian Bezek•30 CommentsRedfin May Not Be Innovative Or Disruptive, Valuation In QuestionRDFN• Yesterday, 10:13 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•59 CommentsKemet Corporation 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKEM• Yesterday, 9:57 AM • SA TranscriptsSnatch Up Fitbit's Shares Ahead Of Its Earnings ReleaseFIT• Yesterday, 9:37 AM • Jeffrey Himelson•65 CommentsRotork: A Surprising Change To Make The Strong, Stronger?Editors' Pick • RTOXF• Yesterday, 9:11 AM • Dividend Drive•1 CommentInterXion Holding N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesINXN• Yesterday, 8:26 AM • SA TranscriptsDrill Baby Drill: Bri-Chem Earnings Preview And Forecast UpdateEditors' Pick • BRYFF• Yesterday, 6:48 AM • Darren McCammon•8 CommentsUnisys Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUIS• Yesterday, 3:20 AM • SA TranscriptsJuly 2017 Recap: Least Active July Since The Financial Crisis With 9 IPOsRDFN, APRN• Yesterday, 1:22 AM • Renaissance Capital IPO Research•1 CommentInvesting In AMDAMD• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:57 PM • Raymond Caron, Ph.D.•108 CommentsGlu Mobile Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGLUU• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:43 PM • SA TranscriptsCoherent, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCOHR• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:31 PM • SA TranscriptsZix Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesZIXI• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:14 PM • SA TranscriptsSnap Stock: Lockup Expiry Yet To Take EffectSNAP• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:18 PM • Amigobulls•34 CommentsLogMeIn Agrees To Acquire Nanorep For Virtual Assistant TechLOGM• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:04 PM • Donovan JonesAmazon: When Earnings Miss For The Right ReasonsAMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:52 PM • Josh Blechman•47 CommentsApple: End The BuybackAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:09 PM • Feria Investor•142 CommentsAmazon's AWS cloud platform is no match for AzureAMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:40 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•71 CommentsTwitter: Wait Wait WaitTWTR• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:29 PM • Celeritas Investments•36 CommentsApple First Look: Strength Across The BoardAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:24 PM • D.M. Martins Research•47 CommentsApple Earnings: No Worries HereAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:08 PM • Bill Maurer•78 CommentsDump Amazon Now?AMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:07 PM • Bill Gunderson•54 CommentsEVERTEC 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEVTC• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:48 PM • SA TranscriptsQuotient Technology Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesQUOT• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:46 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Missing 'M' In Facebook MessengerFB• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:44 PM • Karen Webster•23 CommentsRedfin: Disruptive Predator Or Sessile Bottom Feeder?RDFN• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:24 PM • The Capitalist Pig•13 CommentsSequans Communications 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSQNS• Tue, Aug. 1, 3:09 PM • SA TranscriptsReversal Of Fortune Ahead For Facebook?FB• Tue, Aug. 1, 3:05 PM • Gary Bourgeault•16 CommentsTwitter's New Plan To Drive Growth Could BackfireTWTR• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:55 PM • Amigobulls•12 CommentsNokia: Slow And Steady, No Need To Buckle UpNOK• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:47 PM • D.M. Martins Research•24 Comments123456...1166Next Page


Stock Ideas | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Stock IdeasTesla Q2 Earnings: 'You Need A Telescope To See Who's In Second Place'TSLA• Today, 11:39 AM • Trent EadyRandgold Resources: Too Much Cash On The Balance SheetGOLD• Today, 11:38 AM • The Investment DoctorTesla - The Model 3 Is Part Of The PlanTSLA• Today, 11:36 AM • Paul Anderson•1 CommentFitbit: Sell The RallyFIT• Today, 11:35 AM • Bill Maurer•1 CommentAnnaly: The Classic Double WhammyNLY• Today, 11:35 AM • Quad 7 CapitalCaterpillar Just Raised Its GuidanceCAT• Today, 11:26 AM • John LongsworthAMC Entertainment - A Dealmaking Spree Gone BadAMC• Today, 11:23 AM • The Value InvestorXPO Logistics Is Prepared To Invest Up To $8 Billion In Acquisitions; Hub Group Is An Ideal CandidateXPO• Today, 11:12 AM • James SandsTesla: Q2 Numbers And Call AnalyzedTSLA• Today, 11:07 AM • Donn Bailey•25 CommentsHerbalife: Pivoting To Legitimacy And DeclineHLF• Today, 11:03 AM • Sunil Shah•5 CommentsCostco: Revenue Growth ConcernsCOST• Today, 11:00 AM • Will Healy•7 CommentsMicron: A Sudden Drop Flags TroubleMU• Today, 10:53 AM • The Structure Of Price•27 CommentsAfter AstraZeneca's 'Disaster', What's In Store For Their Immune Checkpoint Program?AZN• Today, 10:33 AM • Zach Hartman, PhDStarbucks: Short-Term Pain, Long-Term GainSBUX• Today, 10:11 AM • Rahul Salgia•4 CommentsWhat Is AT&T Getting Into?T, TWX• Today, 9:58 AM • Jonathan Weber•10 CommentsGetting A Handle On Unilever Plc: A CPG Company With Substantial UpsideUL• Today, 9:53 AM • Michael UguliniSynergy Pharmaceuticals: Debt Vs. Equity Financing And The Concept Of TradeoffsSGYP• Today, 9:49 AM • Life Sciences Millennial•17 CommentsFoot Locker: A Compelling Bargain Bin OpportunityFL• Today, 9:33 AM • Brad KenagySorry, GM And Ford Shareholders, But There Is No 'Plateau'F, GM• Today, 9:32 AM • James Brumley•21 CommentsSears Holdings And ESL Investments: Berkshire Hathaway In Broad DaylightEditors' Pick • SHLD• Today, 9:23 AM • Breeze Block Capital•29 Comments3 Things In Biotech You Should Learn Today: August 3, 2017AGN, AMGN, JNJ• Today, 9:00 AM • Zach Hartman, PhD•1 CommentOcular: Bulls Eye ShortOCUL• Today, 9:00 AM • TripleGate•9 CommentsLook Long On Brink's?BCO• Today, 8:58 AM • Accendo Markets•1 CommentSky's The Limit For ZiopharmZIOP• Today, 8:53 AM • Bulls and Bears of Buckhead•5 CommentsABB Has To Be Better Than This Today, 8:29 AM • Stephen Simpson, CFAValue Investors: This Overlooked Investment Idea Is Too Good And TrueCDDRF• Today, 8:10 AM • Value Digger•7 CommentsVisa And The Future Of Plastic?V• Today, 7:52 AM • Integer Investments•7 Comments5 Reasons Boeing Deserves A Higher Price MultipleBA• Today, 6:21 AM • Pantho Investments•6 CommentsTeradata - When Analyst Disdain Can Be A Good ThingTDC• Today, 5:06 AM • Bert Hochfeld•5 CommentsThumbs Up For One Speculative Stock, Thumbs Down For Another - Cramer's Lightning Round (8/2/17)DVAX, INO, COL• Today, 5:05 AM • SA Editor Michael HopkinsWhat's Behind The Latest Market Movements? - Cramer's Mad Money (8/2/17)GM, AMC, RCL• Today, 5:04 AM • SA Editor Michael Hopkins•3 CommentsIteris: Free Option On The Growth Of Autonomous VehiclesEditors' Pick • ITI• Today, 5:00 AM • Laughing Water Capital•2 CommentsCorning: Uncertainty Created The Drop And An OpportunityGLW• Today, 4:51 AM • Jacob Urban•7 CommentsGenworth Financial: Heads I Win, Tails I Win MoreGNW• Today, 4:44 AM • Scott Molnar, CFA•22 CommentsLet Habit Stock Keep DroppingHABT• Today, 4:41 AM • L&F Capital Management•2 CommentsSB Financial - A Boring Bank With BuybacksSBFG• Today, 3:21 AM • Forrest WilsonA Wallflower At The Robotics Orgy?FANUY• Today, 1:38 AM • Joseph L. Shaefer•7 CommentsDeutsche Bank Stock: Another Buying OpportunityDB• Today, 1:21 AM • Rob Marstrand•7 CommentsTitanium Corp.: A Rapidly Approaching Deadline Will Give Greater Clarity On Its Significant Upside PotentialTITUF• Yesterday, 11:40 PM • Dan StringerSpark Therapeutics' Hemophilia A Data Intriguing, Rise In Shares OverdoneONCE• Yesterday, 11:18 PM • Jonathan Faison•3 CommentsProcter & Gamble Is Right About Peltz's CriticismsPG• Yesterday, 10:18 PM • Cash-Centered Creep•5 CommentsTeva: Walking Dead? - Alternative ModelTEVA• Yesterday, 8:59 PM • Ackerman Value Investments•30 CommentsInput Capital: The Best Stock You've Never Heard OfINPCF• Yesterday, 8:42 PM • Adem Tumerkan•17 CommentsSprint: A Good Time To Buy?S• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•82 Comments3 Reasons To Hold Onto XperiXPER• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Focus Equity•3 CommentsChicago Bridge & Iron: Major Changes Likely ComingCBI• Yesterday, 6:50 PM • Daniel Jones•31 CommentsWhy BP Is The Best Oil Major StockBP• Yesterday, 6:23 PM • Josh Arnold•16 CommentsDiamond Offshore Drilling: Merger? Not NowDO• Yesterday, 6:20 PM • Vladimir Zernov•18 CommentsGear Energy: Cashing In On An AcquisitionGENGF• Yesterday, 5:50 PM • Long Player•15 CommentsBlackBerry: A Mature StartupBBRY• Yesterday, 5:14 PM • Renars G•83 CommentsCan NEOS Survive Efforts To Gain Market Share?NEOS• Yesterday, 5:12 PM • Kenneth Pittman•7 CommentsCarvana: Looking Under The HoodEditors' Pick • CVNA• Yesterday, 4:37 PM • Pluto Research•7 CommentsBuying Opportunity For KEMET Bulls After Preliminary Earnings VolatilityKEM• Yesterday, 4:01 PM • Pantho Investments•3 CommentsThis Could Be The End Of ValeantVRX• Yesterday, 3:48 PM • Short Only•110 CommentsGilead: An Edge At ResistanceGILD• Yesterday, 3:35 PM • Andrew McElroy•36 CommentsApple's Investment Theme Has Not ChangedAAPL• Yesterday, 3:34 PM • George Kesarios•22 CommentsOptimistic Takeaways From Exact Sciences Annual MeetingEXAS• Yesterday, 3:27 PM • Kirk Spano•18 CommentsPapa Johns: What Is Going On Here?PZZA• Yesterday, 3:20 PM • Quad 7 Capital•5 CommentsROTY Edition 1 Volume 16: Updates And A New Runup CandidateAQXP• Yesterday, 3:16 PM • Jonathan Faison•8 CommentsWhy Wells Fargo And JPMorgan Chase Are For Seasoned Bulls And Skittish BearsJPM, WFC• Yesterday, 3:12 PM • Eric Mason•7 CommentsPfizer: Why The Stock May Get Interesting AgainPFE• Yesterday, 3:08 PM • DoctoRx•45 CommentsWhy I Took A Position In Chesapeake Before EarningsCHK• Yesterday, 3:04 PM • Giovanni DiMauro•41 CommentsCognex Is A Terrific Company But Already Fully ValuedCGNX• Yesterday, 2:57 PM • Shareholders Unite•18 CommentsCyberArk - A Summer Low Buy Before A Fall High?CYBR• Yesterday, 2:07 PM • Accendo Markets•2 CommentsBuy Loxo Oncology On Current WeaknessLOXO• Yesterday, 1:43 PM • Jonathan Faison•10 CommentsFEMSA Plugging Away With Its Empire-BuildingEditors' Pick • FMX• Yesterday, 1:41 PM • Stephen Simpson, CFA3 Reasons Why Express Scripts Is A Long-Term Contrarian Value PlayESRX• Yesterday, 1:21 PM • Nelson Nguyen, CFA•21 CommentsAMD: The Good, The Bad, The VegaAMD• Yesterday, 12:58 PM • Austin Craig•228 CommentsSony's Entertainment Businesses Showcase Its Internet Of Things AppealSNE• Yesterday, 12:55 PM • Nick Cox•7 CommentsRadisys: Time To Buy?RSYS• Yesterday, 12:26 PM • Mark Gomes•13 CommentsAMD: Threadripper Will DominateAMD• Yesterday, 12:18 PM • Kumquat Research•58 CommentsShould Investors Continue To Shop At QVC Group?Editors' Pick • QVCA• Yesterday, 12:11 PM • The Boyar Value Group•4 CommentsApple Delivering On Need To Complement iPhone SalesAAPL• Yesterday, 12:09 PM • Gary Bourgeault•21 CommentsWalgreens Boots Alliance: Poised To Move HigherWBA• Yesterday, 12:05 PM • John DiCecco•10 CommentsTesla Q2 Earnings: What I Will Be WatchingTSLA• Yesterday, 11:58 AM • ValueAnalyst•124 Comments123456...2530Next Page








Uni-Pixel, Inc. | Company Spotlight Profile











Warning! This site has features that require JavaScript.












watch








        Uni-Pixel, Inc.
        
      

Sector: 


            Electronic Components Not Elsewhere Classified
          
Region: 

TX, United States


 
  : 

|
Nasdaq: UNXL


  



Listed in: 
Manufacturing


        Similar to:
Mitsubishi Electric Corp.





 No Documents Available

 View Contact Details




×
We're Sorry! We do not have an investor kit available for this company.
          Tell us you want one!





 News & Analysis
















 Featured Company


Kellogg Company
Battle Creek, MI, US
For more than 100 years, Kellogg Company has delivered great taste, nutrition and value to our consumers. And, today, our...







 You may also be interested in:





Mitsubishi Electric Corp.



Tokyo, TY, JP
Mitsubishi Electric Corp. engages in the manufacture, development, and sale of electric and electronic equipment. It operates in the following...




Dassault Aviation SA



Paris, IF, FR
Dassault Aviation SA is engaged in the manufacture and sale of aircraft. It manufactures and distributes its civilian and military...




Thornburg Limited Term Municipal Fund



Santa Fe, NM, US
Investment StrategyThornburg Limited Term Municipal Fund is a laddered portfolio of municipal bonds from throughout the U.S. with an average...










×
Contact Investor Relations



Uni-Pixel, Inc.
Investor Relations
         8708 Technology Forest PlaceSuite 100
         The Woodlands , TX 77381
         United States
Phone:1.281.825.4500

SIC Code:
3679



Close




×
Request Investor Kit









Select your country:


Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire, St. Eust., Saba
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
Brit. Indian Ocean Terr.
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo (Dem. Rep. of the)
Congo (Rep. of)
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Terr.
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard & McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
La Reunion
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marianas
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthelemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre & Miquelon
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Marten
Slovakia
Slovenia
So Georgia & So Sand Isl
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Vincent & Grenadines
St. Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Minor Outlying Isl.
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis & Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe





E-mail:


required field!



First Name:


required field!



Last Name:


required field!




Street 1:


required field!



Street 2:





City:


required field!



State/Province:


-
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming


required field!



Postal Code:


required field!






 I consent to receiving periodic email communications from Uni-Pixel, Inc.. 
            

 I'd like to receive more information from PrecisionIR.
            






Watch

Watch this company to be notified of upcoming earnings calls and new content with a weekly digest sent to your email.
            
 Watch content
            




Go!
Cancel






Company Spotlight is available free to investors through the financial support of participating companies. In return for receiving this free information, your contact data are made available to the companies whose reports you have ordered, and to other parties as described in our privacy policy, which you can read in its entirety here. In addition, you agree to be contacted by these companies from time to time. You may select at any time to opt out of these communications by using the unsubscribe link in your email(s) or by sending an email to nacustomerservice@precisionir.com.



×
 Enter your email address to watch this company.




E-mail (required):


required field!



First Name:





Last Name:












    Signup 




×
  Enter your email address and notification preferences.




A reminder has been added for this event.



    Add to Calendar
  


Add to Google Calendar


Add to Live Calendar


Add to Yahoo! Calendar


Add to iCalender


Add to Outlook Calendar







Or





Send me a reminder




Weeks

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52



Days

0
1
2
3
4
5
6



Hours

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23



Minutes

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52
53
54
55
56
57
58
59





before the event.

Please enter a valid email to watch!

First Name

Last Name








    Signup 








Short Ideas | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Short IdeasFitbit: Sell The RallyFIT• Today, 11:35 AM • Bill Maurer•1 CommentTesla: Q2 Numbers And Call AnalyzedTSLA• Today, 11:07 AM • Donn Bailey•26 CommentsHerbalife: Pivoting To Legitimacy And DeclineHLF• Today, 11:03 AM • Sunil Shah•5 CommentsMicron: A Sudden Drop Flags TroubleMU• Today, 10:53 AM • The Structure Of Price•28 CommentsOcular: Bulls Eye ShortOCUL• Today, 9:00 AM • TripleGate•9 CommentsCarvana: Looking Under The HoodEditors' Pick • CVNA• Yesterday, 4:37 PM • Pluto Research•7 CommentsThis Could Be The End Of ValeantVRX• Yesterday, 3:48 PM • Short Only•110 CommentsDryShips: Another Head FakeDRYS• Yesterday, 10:41 AM • Bill Maurer•32 CommentsRedfin May Not Be Innovative Or Disruptive, Valuation In QuestionRDFN• Yesterday, 10:13 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•59 CommentsEros Earnings Review: An Abundance Of Red FlagsEROS• Yesterday, 8:55 AM • Hindenburg Investment Research•3 CommentsThe Finish Line Remains A Value TrapEditors' Pick • FINL• Yesterday, 8:55 AM • Vince Martin•3 CommentsPandora: Not Much To Be Excited AboutP• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:23 PM • Julie Kent•2 CommentsTesla: A Review Of Damodaran's Valuation ModelTSLA• Tue, Aug. 1, 1:14 PM • Deliberate Valuation•64 CommentsLaunch Of SILIQ Makes Valeant A Great Short OpportunityVRX• Tue, Aug. 1, 8:35 AM • Long Term Bio•46 CommentsTesla Model 3 Launch Exposes Harsh Reality Facing The CompanyTSLA• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:31 AM • EnerTuition•408 CommentsSix Flags Could Lose 25% Of Customers To New Park In MeadowlandsEditors' Pick • SIX• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:30 AM • ManBearChicken•1 CommentMake Lemonade Out Of Lemons: Sell Nabors Industries ShortNBR• Mon, Jul. 31, 6:08 PM • Bobak Forouzan•6 CommentsTesla: More Bad News On Wednesday?TSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 5:55 PM • Donn Bailey•274 CommentsNvidia: A Short Watch Is OnNVDA• Mon, Jul. 31, 4:33 PM • The Structure Of Price•62 CommentsYou Haven't Seen A $44,000 Or $49,000 Tesla Model 3 YetTSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 1:24 PM • Paulo Santos•402 CommentsIs The Tesla Model 3 Inferior To A Toyota Corolla For Half The Price?TSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 12:32 PM • Anton Wahlman•294 CommentsFarewell To Tesla's Phony Mass-Market StoryTSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 12:19 PM • Montana Skeptic•823 CommentsSantander Consumer USA: Fundamentals Are Deteriorating - Remain ShortSC• Mon, Jul. 31, 11:48 AM • Comanche Peak Investments•5 CommentsLet's Look Long Term After Amazon's Earnings MissEditors' Pick • AMZN• Mon, Jul. 31, 11:03 AM • Jeremy Blum•46 CommentsAmazon's Stock Looks Headed For A WaterfallAMZN, COST, HD• Mon, Jul. 31, 1:41 AM • DoctoRx•240 CommentsPRO Weekly Digest: Inside The Mind Of A Short Seller With The Friendly BearEditors' Pick • HMCBF, GHL• Sun, Jul. 30, 7:30 AM • SA PRO Editors•14 CommentsPeeling Back The Label On Boston Beer's Q2 Earnings Surprise - Not As Heady As It First AppearsEditors' Pick • SAM• Sat, Jul. 29, 7:30 AM • Lord Baltimore•13 CommentsAmazon's Stock Is Likely To Pull Back FurtherAMZN• Fri, Jul. 28, 6:56 PM • David Zanoni•75 CommentsTesla Could Sell Off On Any Bad News From These 2 EventsTSLA• Fri, Jul. 28, 6:03 PM • Alex Cho•189 CommentsDryShips: It Ain't Over YetDRYS• Fri, Jul. 28, 5:21 PM • Bill Maurer•33 CommentsLowering Apple's Price Target Ahead Of EarningsAAPL• Fri, Jul. 28, 1:45 PM • Alex Cho•229 CommentsAmazon.com: The Clear Case For Regulatory ActionAMZN• Fri, Jul. 28, 10:37 AM • Paulo Santos•155 CommentsDorel Industries Inc. - Turnaround Unlikely To Happen Any Time SoonEditors' Pick • DIIBF• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:11 PM • Shahid Manzoor, CFAAMD: The Inside StoryAMD• Thu, Jul. 27, 11:16 AM • The Structure Of Price•56 CommentsHasbro Results Portend Further Weakness At Mattel And JAKKS PacificHAS, JAKK, MAT• Thu, Jul. 27, 8:53 AM • ALT Perspective•7 CommentsCan MassRoots Remain A Going Concern?MSRT• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:26 PM • Harlem and Stone•11 CommentsHow WebMD Got Locked Out Of The China MarketWBMD• Wed, Jul. 26, 1:10 PM • Entrepreneur Esq.•1 CommentZion Oil & Gas - Drilling Dry Holes Til $0; Will Bankruptcy Court Or Extreme Dilution Get Them There First?Editors' Pick • ZN• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:30 AM • Fuzzy Panda Shorts•46 CommentsBuyer's Remorse Part III: PCM's Minority ReportPCMI• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:00 AM • Rota Fortunae•6 CommentsDryShips: Look Out BelowDRYS• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:52 PM • Bill Maurer•35 CommentsA Tesla Bull And Bear Debate: 50% Upside Or 50% Downside?TSLA• Tue, Jul. 25, 5:26 PM • Hedgeye•207 CommentsWayfair: It's Getting Much Less Crowded After The Recent Run UpW• Tue, Jul. 25, 3:56 PM • Dan Stringer•35 CommentsIs California Eliminating Incentives For All Teslas?TSLA• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:05 PM • Donn Bailey•150 CommentsBlue Apron: Quiet Period Ends. Prepare To Sell The Bounce.APRN• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:14 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•19 CommentsIs Facebook Exaggerating User Growth And Is That A Threat To Its Valuation?FB• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:00 AM • NYC Trader•78 CommentsUnion Pacific: Driving Toward Our Worst-Case ValuationUNP• Tue, Jul. 25, 7:39 AM • Erik Kobayashi-Solomon•38 CommentsBuyer's Remorse Part II: The Pakistani Coup D'EtatPCMI• Tue, Jul. 25, 6:32 AM • Rota FortunaeThis Is Ground Control To Exchange Income, Your Equity Is CrashingEIFZF• Tue, Jul. 25, 5:19 AM • Bank On Insight•23 CommentsTesla: The 'Ludicrous' Demand Growth Of Model STSLA• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:39 AM • BEV Consulting•77 CommentsWhy You Should Sell Your Apple Shares Before The Next iPhone ReleaseAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:42 PM • Michael A. Ball•130 CommentsTesla's Attempts To Raid California Coffers Unlikely To Be FruitfulTSLA• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:36 PM • EnerTuition•187 CommentsApple iPhone 8 Expectations Trending Lower Ahead Of EarningsAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:45 PM • Alex Cho•61 CommentsNew Theme Park Puts Six Flags At RiskEditors' Pick • SIX• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:52 PM • ManBearChicken•5 CommentsThe Dawn Of The Tesla SmugglerTSLA• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:28 PM • Anton Wahlman•223 CommentsTesla Is Already Winning - Just Not In The Way A Lot Of Investors Want Or ExpectTSLA• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:26 PM • FundamentalSpeculation.IO•76 CommentsLululemon Needs To Step Up Its YOGA Pants GameLULU• Mon, Jul. 24, 6:41 AM • Goddess Diogenes•19 CommentsAvoid Sears Stock Like The PlagueSHLD• Sun, Jul. 23, 6:36 AM • Christopher Yuen•68 CommentsHow To Value BitcoinBITCF, BTSC, COIN• Sat, Jul. 22, 4:04 AM • Silky Oak Capital•115 CommentsThe Short Case For WelbiltEditors' Pick • WBT• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Rational Short Investor•4 CommentsThe Short Case For Singapore Press HoldingsEditors' Pick • SGPRY, SGPRF• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Warren Chan•2 CommentsHotel California: Why Tesla Can Check Out Any Time It Likes, But It Can Never LeaveTSLA• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:13 PM • Trapping Value•167 CommentsDump Cincinnati Bell On 2 Terrible AcquisitionsEditors' Pick • CBB, HCOM• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:39 AM • John Zhang•10 CommentsUnited Therapeutics Losing The Crown Jewels; 20% EPS Downgrades AheadUTHR• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:32 AM • World's Greatest•9 CommentsValue Trap: Adient Plc's Contradicting Growth OutlookADNT• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:19 AM • Centaur Investments•5 CommentsWhy Fifth Street Senior Floating Is OvervaluedFSFR• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:43 PM • Nicholas Marshi•46 CommentsThe Short Case For HubspotEditors' Pick • HUBS• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:00 PM • Short Biased•4 CommentsInstalled Building Products: Expectations Seem Too HighIBP• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:25 PM • Michael BoydRevenues Aren't The Only Thing Falling At IBMIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:01 PM • Marshall Thomas•14 CommentsDryShips' All-Time High - $1.47 Billion A Share?DRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:49 AM • Research & Investment•49 CommentsViewRay: Initiate Strong Sell On Questionable Backlog, Product Inferiority, And Bankruptcy ConcernsEditors' Pick • VRAY• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:45 AM • Mako Research•138 CommentsNow Is Not The Time To Buy TeslaTSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:44 PM • Isaac Tang•68 CommentsCato Is An Easy Short, Even At 6x P/EEditors' Pick • CATO• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:32 PM • Vince Martin•8 CommentsApple's Long Bull Run May Be EndingAAPL• Wed, Jul. 19, 1:17 PM • Michael Blair•139 CommentsAkzo Nobel Gets New CEO But Little Will ChangeAKZOY, PPG• Wed, Jul. 19, 12:05 PM • Dr. Harold Goldmeier•2 CommentsDo New Tesla Board Additions Signal Big Changes Ahead?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 11:38 AM • Donn Bailey•137 Comments123456...246Next Page


Short Ideas | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Short IdeasFitbit: Sell The RallyFIT• Today, 11:35 AM • Bill Maurer•1 CommentTesla: Q2 Numbers And Call AnalyzedTSLA• Today, 11:07 AM • Donn Bailey•26 CommentsHerbalife: Pivoting To Legitimacy And DeclineHLF• Today, 11:03 AM • Sunil Shah•5 CommentsMicron: A Sudden Drop Flags TroubleMU• Today, 10:53 AM • The Structure Of Price•28 CommentsOcular: Bulls Eye ShortOCUL• Today, 9:00 AM • TripleGate•9 CommentsCarvana: Looking Under The HoodEditors' Pick • CVNA• Yesterday, 4:37 PM • Pluto Research•7 CommentsThis Could Be The End Of ValeantVRX• Yesterday, 3:48 PM • Short Only•110 CommentsDryShips: Another Head FakeDRYS• Yesterday, 10:41 AM • Bill Maurer•32 CommentsRedfin May Not Be Innovative Or Disruptive, Valuation In QuestionRDFN• Yesterday, 10:13 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•59 CommentsEros Earnings Review: An Abundance Of Red FlagsEROS• Yesterday, 8:55 AM • Hindenburg Investment Research•3 CommentsThe Finish Line Remains A Value TrapEditors' Pick • FINL• Yesterday, 8:55 AM • Vince Martin•3 CommentsPandora: Not Much To Be Excited AboutP• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:23 PM • Julie Kent•2 CommentsTesla: A Review Of Damodaran's Valuation ModelTSLA• Tue, Aug. 1, 1:14 PM • Deliberate Valuation•64 CommentsLaunch Of SILIQ Makes Valeant A Great Short OpportunityVRX• Tue, Aug. 1, 8:35 AM • Long Term Bio•46 CommentsTesla Model 3 Launch Exposes Harsh Reality Facing The CompanyTSLA• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:31 AM • EnerTuition•408 CommentsSix Flags Could Lose 25% Of Customers To New Park In MeadowlandsEditors' Pick • SIX• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:30 AM • ManBearChicken•1 CommentMake Lemonade Out Of Lemons: Sell Nabors Industries ShortNBR• Mon, Jul. 31, 6:08 PM • Bobak Forouzan•6 CommentsTesla: More Bad News On Wednesday?TSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 5:55 PM • Donn Bailey•274 CommentsNvidia: A Short Watch Is OnNVDA• Mon, Jul. 31, 4:33 PM • The Structure Of Price•62 CommentsYou Haven't Seen A $44,000 Or $49,000 Tesla Model 3 YetTSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 1:24 PM • Paulo Santos•402 CommentsIs The Tesla Model 3 Inferior To A Toyota Corolla For Half The Price?TSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 12:32 PM • Anton Wahlman•294 CommentsFarewell To Tesla's Phony Mass-Market StoryTSLA• Mon, Jul. 31, 12:19 PM • Montana Skeptic•823 CommentsSantander Consumer USA: Fundamentals Are Deteriorating - Remain ShortSC• Mon, Jul. 31, 11:48 AM • Comanche Peak Investments•5 CommentsLet's Look Long Term After Amazon's Earnings MissEditors' Pick • AMZN• Mon, Jul. 31, 11:03 AM • Jeremy Blum•46 CommentsAmazon's Stock Looks Headed For A WaterfallAMZN, COST, HD• Mon, Jul. 31, 1:41 AM • DoctoRx•240 CommentsPRO Weekly Digest: Inside The Mind Of A Short Seller With The Friendly BearEditors' Pick • HMCBF, GHL• Sun, Jul. 30, 7:30 AM • SA PRO Editors•14 CommentsPeeling Back The Label On Boston Beer's Q2 Earnings Surprise - Not As Heady As It First AppearsEditors' Pick • SAM• Sat, Jul. 29, 7:30 AM • Lord Baltimore•13 CommentsAmazon's Stock Is Likely To Pull Back FurtherAMZN• Fri, Jul. 28, 6:56 PM • David Zanoni•75 CommentsTesla Could Sell Off On Any Bad News From These 2 EventsTSLA• Fri, Jul. 28, 6:03 PM • Alex Cho•189 CommentsDryShips: It Ain't Over YetDRYS• Fri, Jul. 28, 5:21 PM • Bill Maurer•33 CommentsLowering Apple's Price Target Ahead Of EarningsAAPL• Fri, Jul. 28, 1:45 PM • Alex Cho•229 CommentsAmazon.com: The Clear Case For Regulatory ActionAMZN• Fri, Jul. 28, 10:37 AM • Paulo Santos•155 CommentsDorel Industries Inc. - Turnaround Unlikely To Happen Any Time SoonEditors' Pick • DIIBF• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:11 PM • Shahid Manzoor, CFAAMD: The Inside StoryAMD• Thu, Jul. 27, 11:16 AM • The Structure Of Price•56 CommentsHasbro Results Portend Further Weakness At Mattel And JAKKS PacificHAS, JAKK, MAT• Thu, Jul. 27, 8:53 AM • ALT Perspective•7 CommentsCan MassRoots Remain A Going Concern?MSRT• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:26 PM • Harlem and Stone•11 CommentsHow WebMD Got Locked Out Of The China MarketWBMD• Wed, Jul. 26, 1:10 PM • Entrepreneur Esq.•1 CommentZion Oil & Gas - Drilling Dry Holes Til $0; Will Bankruptcy Court Or Extreme Dilution Get Them There First?Editors' Pick • ZN• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:30 AM • Fuzzy Panda Shorts•46 CommentsBuyer's Remorse Part III: PCM's Minority ReportPCMI• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:00 AM • Rota Fortunae•6 CommentsDryShips: Look Out BelowDRYS• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:52 PM • Bill Maurer•35 CommentsA Tesla Bull And Bear Debate: 50% Upside Or 50% Downside?TSLA• Tue, Jul. 25, 5:26 PM • Hedgeye•207 CommentsWayfair: It's Getting Much Less Crowded After The Recent Run UpW• Tue, Jul. 25, 3:56 PM • Dan Stringer•35 CommentsIs California Eliminating Incentives For All Teslas?TSLA• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:05 PM • Donn Bailey•150 CommentsBlue Apron: Quiet Period Ends. Prepare To Sell The Bounce.APRN• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:14 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•19 CommentsIs Facebook Exaggerating User Growth And Is That A Threat To Its Valuation?FB• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:00 AM • NYC Trader•78 CommentsUnion Pacific: Driving Toward Our Worst-Case ValuationUNP• Tue, Jul. 25, 7:39 AM • Erik Kobayashi-Solomon•38 CommentsBuyer's Remorse Part II: The Pakistani Coup D'EtatPCMI• Tue, Jul. 25, 6:32 AM • Rota FortunaeThis Is Ground Control To Exchange Income, Your Equity Is CrashingEIFZF• Tue, Jul. 25, 5:19 AM • Bank On Insight•23 CommentsTesla: The 'Ludicrous' Demand Growth Of Model STSLA• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:39 AM • BEV Consulting•77 CommentsWhy You Should Sell Your Apple Shares Before The Next iPhone ReleaseAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:42 PM • Michael A. Ball•130 CommentsTesla's Attempts To Raid California Coffers Unlikely To Be FruitfulTSLA• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:36 PM • EnerTuition•187 CommentsApple iPhone 8 Expectations Trending Lower Ahead Of EarningsAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:45 PM • Alex Cho•61 CommentsNew Theme Park Puts Six Flags At RiskEditors' Pick • SIX• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:52 PM • ManBearChicken•5 CommentsThe Dawn Of The Tesla SmugglerTSLA• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:28 PM • Anton Wahlman•223 CommentsTesla Is Already Winning - Just Not In The Way A Lot Of Investors Want Or ExpectTSLA• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:26 PM • FundamentalSpeculation.IO•76 CommentsLululemon Needs To Step Up Its YOGA Pants GameLULU• Mon, Jul. 24, 6:41 AM • Goddess Diogenes•19 CommentsAvoid Sears Stock Like The PlagueSHLD• Sun, Jul. 23, 6:36 AM • Christopher Yuen•68 CommentsHow To Value BitcoinBITCF, BTSC, COIN• Sat, Jul. 22, 4:04 AM • Silky Oak Capital•115 CommentsThe Short Case For WelbiltEditors' Pick • WBT• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Rational Short Investor•4 CommentsThe Short Case For Singapore Press HoldingsEditors' Pick • SGPRY, SGPRF• Fri, Jul. 21, 4:00 PM • Warren Chan•2 CommentsHotel California: Why Tesla Can Check Out Any Time It Likes, But It Can Never LeaveTSLA• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:13 PM • Trapping Value•167 CommentsDump Cincinnati Bell On 2 Terrible AcquisitionsEditors' Pick • CBB, HCOM• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:39 AM • John Zhang•10 CommentsUnited Therapeutics Losing The Crown Jewels; 20% EPS Downgrades AheadUTHR• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:32 AM • World's Greatest•9 CommentsValue Trap: Adient Plc's Contradicting Growth OutlookADNT• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:19 AM • Centaur Investments•5 CommentsWhy Fifth Street Senior Floating Is OvervaluedFSFR• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:43 PM • Nicholas Marshi•46 CommentsThe Short Case For HubspotEditors' Pick • HUBS• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:00 PM • Short Biased•4 CommentsInstalled Building Products: Expectations Seem Too HighIBP• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:25 PM • Michael BoydRevenues Aren't The Only Thing Falling At IBMIBM• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:01 PM • Marshall Thomas•14 CommentsDryShips' All-Time High - $1.47 Billion A Share?DRYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:49 AM • Research & Investment•49 CommentsViewRay: Initiate Strong Sell On Questionable Backlog, Product Inferiority, And Bankruptcy ConcernsEditors' Pick • VRAY• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:45 AM • Mako Research•138 CommentsNow Is Not The Time To Buy TeslaTSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:44 PM • Isaac Tang•68 CommentsCato Is An Easy Short, Even At 6x P/EEditors' Pick • CATO• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:32 PM • Vince Martin•8 CommentsApple's Long Bull Run May Be EndingAAPL• Wed, Jul. 19, 1:17 PM • Michael Blair•139 CommentsAkzo Nobel Gets New CEO But Little Will ChangeAKZOY, PPG• Wed, Jul. 19, 12:05 PM • Dr. Harold Goldmeier•2 CommentsDo New Tesla Board Additions Signal Big Changes Ahead?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 11:38 AM • Donn Bailey•137 Comments123456...246Next Page


The Obstacles To UniPixel's Production And Shipments - Uni-Pixel, Inc. (NASDAQ:UNXL) | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»The Obstacles To UniPixel's Production And ShipmentsNov. 7.13 | About: Uni-Pixel, Inc. (UNXL) Richard X Roe Long/short equityThe reason for the ongoing delay in production and shipments of UniPixel's (NASDAQ:UNXL) touch sensors since April appears to be the unacceptable (as low as 30%) manufacturing yield at the module level, effectively rendering the product unusable. Today's press release about a purchase order seems to be a diversion, similar to an earlier announcement by a competitor, Atmel (NASDAQ:ATML), that reported an order and subsequent shipment to Asus (OTC:AKCPF), but the few thousand sensors shipped never ended up in devices on the store shelves. The irony is that, based on public disclosures, the touch modules built with UniPixel's product are simply not price competitive, so the company may be unable to find customers even if it gives its sensors away for free.
Lack of Product Qualification
When asked about the obstacles to meaningful production at the Oppenheimer Emerging Innovations Conference on September 17, UniPixel's CEO stated that it was all about quality and testing, admitting:
"But if we are shipping rolls of film over there [to the module integration partner in China], and they are die cutting and laminating and coming back and saying, "You guys are only yielding 30% or only yielding 50%," we have to scratch our heads and say, "Where is the failure happening?" because it should be better than that. So, we look at it, and if we don't get it 100% tested before it gets there, then when they handle it, do they scratch it or have a bad TAB [tape-automated bonding] on, do they have this or that, then it becomes a pissing contest [about] whose problem it is. And we don't necessarily want that - coming out of the gate, we want to be able to be in control of our investment there."
Even a 10% deviation from anticipated yield in the module integration process at the touch panel manufacturer (that is, the ODM), before the final screen is shipped to the PC manufacturer (that is, the OEM), is problematic, because the ODM profit margins are already razor thin. For example, TPK (3673:TT), the largest and most efficient touch module maker, had only a 12% gross margin and a 4% operating margin in the latest quarter.

UniPixel has always maintained that there are no quality problems on its side. The company previously told investors, on the February 26 earnings call, that if it had to ship product on that day, it could. In March, at the Roth Capital Partners Annual Growth Stock Conference, it disclosed that it expected yields to be 85% and improve further. By the time the company's production capacity was to go live in late April, the number had dropped to 70%, but the company was planning to improve it by introducing more automated real-time, in-line testing, as disclosed on the April 30 earnings call.
UniPixel made its first production-level shipment attempt on April 26. The handpicked 50 sensor units were to be assembled by the ODM into touch modules within the following 4-6 weeks, and then used in touch-enabled notebooks that were to undergo extensive qualification testing.
On May 20 the company disclosed a production and shipment delay, putting the blame on its PC manufacturing partner and Microsoft, claiming that a slippage in Windows 8.1 release date caused the PC partner to change its anticipated design and production timeline, and moving the expectation for products on the shelves from Q3 to Q4.
That explanation makes no sense. By the time UniPixel shipped its first sensor units in late April, it was common knowledge that Windows 8.1 would be released to manufacturers on or around August, and Microsoft ended up delivering it right on target in late August. Moreover, a Windows 8.1 delay should not have affected any PC design changes or notebook release dates. Windows 8.1 is not a new operating system, but a minor update, available for free download for any PC that has Windows 8 already installed. Specifically, all the 17 hardware requirements for touch screens (see the Device.Digitizer.Touch section) have remained the same between the 8 and 8.1 versions.
At the Cowen Technology, Media & Telecom Conference on May 30, right around the time when the ODM was supposed to have completed the modules from the first sensor batch, the company's CEO told investors that the shipment had been, effectively, rejected, and the company was working on redesigning the sensor and reshipping the units at some future date. Supposedly, the PC partner was doing away with the "home button," a change in the design caused by the operating system update delay. However, that explanation also makes no sense as the first 50 units shipped were notebook sensor units, and, unlike tablets, notebooks designed for Windows simply do not have a home button on the screen to begin with - that function is fulfilled by a Windows logo key,  or , on the keyboard.


Moreover, a delay in a notebook platform should not have affected the production and shipments of tablet units in Q2. On its earnings call in November 2012, the company had disclosed that its design wins were staged "right behind each other" (at that time, there were four products - one 11.6 notebook and three 10.8 inch tablets). On an investor call on April 15, only eleven days before the shipment attempt, the company maintained that its sensors were scheduled to be utilized in two notebook and three tablet products as part of the production orders to be placed by the PC partner in Q2, and that order visibility was "pretty good." And since some of the designs were supposed to be transitional (products already on the market to be retrofit/refreshed with UniPixel's sensor) rather than dedicated (new products designed specificity to UniPixel's sensor), a postponement of one platform should not have affected the planned retrofit with UniPixel's sensors in the quarter. All the PC OEMs have continued to manufacture touch-enabled devices and have released new tablet and notebook models since, including ones with Windows 8.1 pre-installed.
Finally, if the delay were only due to an operating system or a "home button" redesign, UniPixel should have been back on track already. On the August 8 earnings call, the company reported that it was "submitting new sensors for evaluation and approval," meaning its sensors still had a chance to be built into modules sometime in September and appear in final products on store shelves in Q4. However, on September 17, the company's CEO not only confirmed that it was already too late for products on the shelves by the end of the year, but, when asked about Q1 2014, he offered an uncommitted "I think so," followed by the qualification that 1) it is up to its PC partner whether to put product on the shelves, and 2) the PC partner may "not necessarily" be the one with the first product, despite having certain exclusivity. As of today, despite the press release about a purchase order, there has been no announcement from the company that it has met its production qualification requirements or that its sensors are about to appear in actual devices on store shelves.

Lack of Price Competitiveness
Getting a purchase order and even shipping a product may be moot at this point. The touch modules with UniPixel sensors appear to be priced too high compared to the regular ITO modules, which dominate the market, and may not sell, based on public selling price disclosures by the company. Even if the company were to give away its product for free, the module price may still be above current market prices.
The touch market had been capacity constrained in late 2012 and early 2013, especially for larger-size modules, driving prices up and forcing PC OEMs to scramble to secure guaranteed supply. At the time, paying for new capacity or even new, but unproven technologies, such as metal mesh, probably sounded like a good idea. A PC manufacturer signed a "multi-million dollar" preferred price and capacity license agreement with UniPixel in December. Intel (NASDAQ:INTC) followed up in April, after having previously paid millions of dollars to the major touch module makers to ensure adequate production capacity.
However, by August the shortage was all over. In early September, Intel declared that "touch as a supply issue is completely gone," in effect, admitting that securing touch production capacity may have been a mistake and waste of money.
When asked at the Oppenheimer conference a few days later about the developing price war and oversupply in the touch market, the CEO admitted his "belief" that TPK was selling a 13.3-inch touch module at $2.5 per diagonal inch. But the CEO did not agree with Intel's conclusion, stating,
"Every time Intel comes back to talk to us, they say the price is going down, and I say no, it is not."
Notebook module prices have fallen 20% since. A recent research report stated that the price of a 14-inch module was "expected to decrease from $50 to $30 [or, $2.1 per diagonal inch], touching $20 in 2014 and $15 in 2015." And then on November 4, Digitimes reported,
"Notebook vendors have begun to increasingly care about the price of touch panels but not about quality, and quotes for notebook-use touch panel modules have dropped from $4.0-4.5/inch in the first half of 2013 to $3.5-4.0/inch in mid-2013 and further to $2.0-2.3/inch currently."

Touch modules for tablets are also dropping in price - WitsView reports $12 average price for a 7-inch touch module in October, or $1.7/inch, an 8% drop from September. On its latest earnings call, TPK said that it did not expect prices to stabilize at least until Q3 2014.
UniPixel insists that it is the low-cost producer in the world even though it is not shipping product and its qualification units fail on module level. The slide below, taken from the company's presentation at the Roth conference just eight months ago, shows pricing and savings comparison between the products on the market (overwhelmingly using ITO technologies) and UniPixel's for various sensors and modules built from those sensors. UniPixel's pricing structure, specifically on module level, is already woefully outdated.

For example, using the numbers from the table, a 7-inch UniPixel sensor for tablets is sold for $10, generating savings of 50% compared to the $20 ITO sensor. So the ITO module is $40 (since the $20 sensor is 50% of the module price), while the module with a UniPixel's sensor is supposed to be about $28 (providing 29% savings vs the ITO module). Even if UniPixel gives away its sensor for free, the module price comes down to something like $18 ($28 less the $10 sensor). But the current market price for 7-inch touch modules is $12, or about 30% lower than the price of a module with a free UniPixel sensor from the table.
Similarly, a 13-inch UniPixel sensor for tablets is sold for $22, generating savings of 50% compared to the $44 ITO sensor. So the ITO module is $80 (since the $44 sensor is 55% of the module price), while the module with a UniPixel's sensor is supposed to be about $55 (providing 31% savings vs the ITO module). Even if UniPixel gives away its sensor for free, the module price comes down to something like $33 ($55 less the $22 sensor). But the current market price for 13-inch touch modules is about $26 ($13 x $2/inch), or about 20% lower than a module with a free UniPixel sensor.

Kodak can't turn things around
Just a few days before UniPixel's first shipment in April, Kodak (NYSE:KODK) signed a manufacturing and supply agreement to jointly produce the company's sensors. Kodak's renewed emphasis on printed electronics with specific focus on touch sensors and its continued involvement with the company may appear to be a major boost to UniPixel's credibility. However, the management that got Kodak into trouble and Chapter 11 has not changed. In the words of a former employee,
"It's hard to believe that you can solve a problem using the same consciousness that created it in the first place."
Kodak's initial foray into touch sensors in 2011, using a different technology, has failed to gain any market traction. Even today the company is hedging its bet by actively partnering with Kingsbury/Optimation Techology, planning its "first" market entry with them, while the partnership with UniPixel is supposed to be a next, "Phase 1.5." (Slide 32).
Kodak's ambivalence is probably justified. Print experts intimately familiar with Kodak's capabilities and the limits of printing technology are skeptical that even Kodak possesses the ability to reliably print 5-micron-wide lines with catalytic ink using a flexographic process (UniPixel has been secretive about its printing process, but customs records show that a flexographic cleaning machine destined for the joint manufacturing facility arrived in late September). To quote,
"There is a difference between technically possible and technically probable."
So it is not surprising that several officers and directors of UniPixel set up 10b5-1 trading plans in early June shortly after the delay announcement and have been selling regularly since.
Disclosure: I am short UNXL. I wrote this article myself, and it expresses my own opinions. I am not receiving compensation for it (other than from Seeking Alpha). I have no business relationship with any company whose stock is mentioned in this article.About this article:ExpandAuthor payment: $35 + $0.01/page view. Authors of PRO articles receive a minimum guaranteed payment of $150-500.Tagged: Investing Ideas, Short Ideas, Technology, Diversified Electronics, Editors' PicksWant to share your opinion on this article? Add a comment.Disagree with this article? Submit your own.To report a factual error in this article, click hereFollow Richard X Roe and get email alerts











Uni-Pixel Inc - NASDAQ:UNXL - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet




























 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street










































 

















Uni-Pixel Inc (UNXL)
Follow




                                    0.32
                                

0.04
12.00




                        NASDAQ : Technology
                    

Aug 3, 2017 11:31 AM EDT












Prev Close
  0.36


Open
0.36


Day Low/High

                                    0.30 /
                                    0.36


52 Wk Low/High

                                    0.35 /
                                    2.88
                                


Volume
914.57K


Avg Volume 
873.10K











Exchange
NASDAQ


Shares Outstanding
64.51M


Market Cap
24.51M


EPS
-0.70


P/E Ratio

                                        
                                            N/A
                                        
                                    


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            N.A. (N.A)
                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News














UniPixel Sets Second Quarter Fiscal Year 2017 Conference Call For Thursday, August 10, 2017 At 4:30 P.m. ET
















UniPixel Consolidates R&D And Operations; Streamlines Company For Flexibility And Cost Savings













UniPixel And GIS Execute Agreement For Joint Development Of Touch Sensors For Flexible Display
General Interface Solutions, a subsidiary of Foxconn, and UniPixel combine technology advantages to address flexible display market

Jun 21, 2017 7:30 AM EDT









UniPixel, Inc. Recesses Annual Meeting Until May 23, 2017


May 18, 2017 4:15 PM EDT













Analysts' Actions -- Chemours, Incyte, Visteon, Toyota and More
Here are Friday's top research calls, including upgrades for Chemours, Incyte and Toyota, and new coverage of Visteon.

May 12, 2017 9:18 AM EDT









UniPixel Sets First Quarter Fiscal Year 2017 Conference Call For Thursday, May 11, 2017 At 4:30 P.m. ET


May 2, 2017 8:01 AM EDT









UniPixel Expands Manufacturing Capacity
Company provides manufacturing updates

Apr 28, 2017 7:30 AM EDT









UniPixel Awarded 10.1-inch Active Stylus Enabled Tablet For A Major Japan-based PC Manufacturer
26th design award since January 1, 2016

Mar 30, 2017 8:01 AM EDT









UniPixel Signs Long-Term Agreement With Major U.S.-based PC Maker To Supply XTouch Sensors
Agreement includes access to UniPixel technology roadmap

Mar 22, 2017 8:01 AM EDT









UniPixel Sets Fourth Quarter And Fiscal Year 2016 Conference Call For Thursday, March 30, 2017 At 4:30 P.m. ET


Mar 15, 2017 8:31 AM EDT









UniPixel To Present At 29th Annual ROTH Conference
Company will present at 1:00 pm ET / 10 am PT on Monday, March 13, 2017

Mar 6, 2017 4:05 PM EST









UniPixel Closes $10 Million Public Offering Of Its Common Stock And Warrants To Purchase Common Stock


Feb 21, 2017 4:15 PM EST









UniPixel Prices $10 Million Public Offering Of Its Common Stock And Warrants To Purchase Common Stock


Feb 15, 2017 9:30 AM EST









UniPixel Announces Public Offering Of Its Common Stock And Warrants To Purchase Common Stock


Feb 14, 2017 4:00 AM EST









UniPixel Prepares For Flexible Display Market
UniPixel touch sensors pass 200,000 cycle fold test

Feb 7, 2017 8:31 AM EST









UniPixel Ships Half Million XTouch Sensors For Major U.S. Wireless Carrier Consumer Tablet Since Q3 2016


Jan 31, 2017 8:01 AM EST













Insider Trading Alert - MED, SNAK And UNXL Traded By Insiders
Stocks with insider trader activity include MED, SNAK and UNXL

Jun 2, 2016 12:45 PM EDT













Trade-Ideas: Uni-pixel (UNXL) Is Today's Strong On High Relative Volume Stock
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Uni-pixel (UNXL) as a strong on high relative volume candidate

Apr 26, 2016 10:09 AM EDT













5 Stocks Under $10 Set to Soar Higher
These stocks trading for less than $10 a share are within range of triggering breakout trades.

Apr 21, 2016 11:17 AM EDT













Trade-Ideas: Uni-pixel (UNXL) Is Today's Weak On High Relative Volume Stock
Trade-Ideas LLC identified Uni-pixel (UNXL) as a weak on high relative volume candidate

Apr 21, 2016 10:04 AM EDT













Insider Trading Alert - UNXL, SSS And MLM Traded By Insiders
Stocks with insider trader activity include UNXL, SSS and MLM

Dec 1, 2015 12:17 PM EST













4 Stocks Under $10 Making Big Moves
When a stock makes a large-percentage move, it is often just the start of a new major trend -- a trend that can lead to huge profits.

Oct 8, 2015 3:21 PM EDT













4 Stocks Under $10 Making Big Moves Higher
When a stock makes a large-percentage move, it is often just the start of a new major trend -- a trend that can lead to huge profits.

Sep 15, 2015 1:58 PM EDT













UniPixel (UNXL) Stock Gains on New Sample Shipment
UniPixel (UNXL) shares are higher after the company announces it sent a shipment of touchscreen engineering samples to a Tier 1 PC OEM.

Sep 3, 2015 10:19 AM EDT













5 Stocks Under $10 Set to Soar
These under-$10 stocks look poised to break out and move higher from current levels.

Apr 9, 2015 10:16 AM EDT













The Rosen Law Firm, P.A., Glancy Binkow & Goldberg LLP, And Pomerantz LLP Announces Proposed Class Action Settlement On Behalf Of Purchasers Of Common Stock Of Uni-Pixel, Inc.
The Rosen Law Firm, P.A.

Jan 23, 2015 8:00 AM EST













4 Stocks Under $10 Moving Higher
When a stock makes a large-percentage move, it is often just the start of a new major trend -- a trend that can lead to huge profits.

Jul 11, 2014 7:00 AM EDT













Why UniPixel (UNXL) Stock Is Skyrocketing This Morning
UniPixel (UNXL) stock is jumping after the company announced it has made a breakthrough in the roll-to-roll plating process of its touch screen sensors.

Jun 26, 2014 10:25 AM EDT













5 Stocks Poised to Break Out
These stocks look ready to break out and trade higher from current levels.

Jun 6, 2014 2:27 PM EDT













TheStreet Ratings Team Reiterates Uni-Pixel (UNXL) Stock as a "Sell"
Uni-Pixel (UNXL) soared Thursday to continue Wednesday's gains despite a lack of any significant news on the stock.

Jun 5, 2014 2:23 PM EDT












Next






Load More









Quant Rating on 11:31 AM EDT 8/3/2017


D-
(Sell)






Get the (UNXL) Report Here 







From Our Partners



Energous: Carrot Slips Further And Further Away

SeekingAlpha



Uni-Pixel price target lowered to $1 on delayed revenue ramp at Benchmark

The Fly



Uni-Pixel downgraded to Neutral from Buy at Roth Capital

The Fly



Uni-Pixel misses by $0.04, misses on revenue

SeekingAlpha



Notable earnings after Thursday’s close

SeekingAlpha



Uni-Pixel misses by $0.05,  revenue in-line

SeekingAlpha



New design win for UniPixel; +2% premarket

SeekingAlpha



Notable earnings after Thursday’s close

SeekingAlpha



UniPixel +25% pre-market, enters multi-year arrangement with major U.S. PC manufacturer for XTouch sensor supply

SeekingAlpha



Benchmark says move Uni-Pixel to 'front burner' ahead of important year

The Fly



Uni-Pixel (UNXL) Presents At 29th Annual ROTH Conference 2017

SeekingAlpha



Technology - Top Gainers / Losers as of 3:00 pm

SeekingAlpha



Premarket Gainers / Losers as of 9:10 am

SeekingAlpha



Technology - Top Gainers / Losers as of 3:00 pm

SeekingAlpha



Midday Gainers / Losers

SeekingAlpha




















TheStreet
Quant Rating:

D- (Sell)



Get the (UNXL) Report Here 










 








Trending


Apple Has Discovered a Secret Pool of People That Really Want to Use iPads


Elon Musk Reveals Tons of People Have Canceled Tesla Model 3 Orders, Proving Several Key Things


Tim Cook on Trump's Claim that Apple Is Building 3 U.S. Factories: 'There's More We Can Do'


It Has Gotten So Sad for Costco and Sam's Club They Are Discounting Stuff on Groupon


Here's How Much Money Warren Buffett Has Made on Apple Stock in 2017 Alone











Advertising Partners
 
 
 
 













 












 


































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers
 
 
 
 
 
 








Technology Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Technology StocksFitbit: Sell The RallyFIT• Today, 11:35 AM • Bill Maurer•1 CommentFitbit: Encouraging Narrative, Results Still MixedFIT• Today, 11:26 AM • D.M. Martins ResearchIron Mountain: Take A Closer Look Before Going For The DividendIRM• Today, 11:00 AM • Jonathan Weber•3 CommentsApplied Optoelectronics: China Fears Loom Before EarningsAAOI• Today, 10:57 AM • Kumquat Research•23 CommentsFrontier Communications: Much Better Than Market FearsFTR• Today, 10:57 AM • Stone Fox Capital•7 CommentsSilicon Motion: Slyly Taking AdvantageSIMO• Today, 10:54 AM • Jenks Jumps•1 CommentMicron: A Sudden Drop Flags TroubleMU• Today, 10:53 AM • The Structure Of Price•27 CommentsGTT Communications, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGTT• Today, 10:31 AM • SA TranscriptsFitbit- The Tides Are TurningFIT• Today, 9:22 AM • Jeffrey Himelson•13 CommentsFrontier: Don't Be FooledFTR• Today, 9:00 AM • Business Quant•16 CommentsAT&T Nosedives Over 2%... What Gives?T• Today, 8:00 AM • David Alton Clark•49 CommentsWhy Amazon Will Not Kill This BusinessAMZN• Today, 5:45 AM • Vitaliy Katsenelson, CFA•15 CommentsTeradata - When Analyst Disdain Can Be A Good ThingTDC• Today, 5:06 AM • Bert Hochfeld•5 CommentsIteris: Free Option On The Growth Of Autonomous VehiclesEditors' Pick • ITI• Today, 5:00 AM • Laughing Water Capital•2 CommentsCorning: Uncertainty Created The Drop And An OpportunityGLW• Today, 4:51 AM • Jacob Urban•7 CommentsFollowing The Surprising PureFunds Dismissal, Here's How The Cybersecurity ETF Will ChangeHACK• Today, 1:11 AM • Dave DierkingCastlight Health, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCSLT• Yesterday, 9:17 PM • SA TranscriptsFormFactor, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFORM• Yesterday, 7:45 PM • SA TranscriptsSprint: A Good Time To Buy?S• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•82 Comments3 Reasons To Hold Onto XperiXPER• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Focus Equity•3 CommentsiPass Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIPAS• Yesterday, 7:12 PM • SA TranscriptsBrooks Automation, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBRKS• Yesterday, 6:49 PM • SA TranscriptsFirst Solar And The Gift Of U.S. Market DominionFSLR• Yesterday, 6:03 PM • Robert Dydo•13 CommentsItron, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesITRI• Yesterday, 5:41 PM • SA TranscriptsWhat You Need To Know As Hortonworks Announces Q2 ResultsHDP• Yesterday, 5:17 PM • Virginia Backaitis•6 CommentsBlackBerry: A Mature StartupBBRY• Yesterday, 5:14 PM • Renars G•83 CommentsCommerceHub, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCHUBA• Yesterday, 5:09 PM • SA TranscriptsRealPage 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRP• Yesterday, 4:38 PM • SA TranscriptsBuying Opportunity For KEMET Bulls After Preliminary Earnings VolatilityKEM• Yesterday, 4:01 PM • Pantho Investments•3 CommentsApple's Investment Theme Has Not ChangedAAPL• Yesterday, 3:34 PM • George Kesarios•22 CommentsKDDI To Acquire SORACOM For IoT CommunicationsKDDIY• Yesterday, 3:18 PM • Donovan JonesCognex Is A Terrific Company But Already Fully ValuedCGNX• Yesterday, 2:57 PM • Shareholders Unite•18 CommentsApple's Quarterly Results: No Pause HereAAPL• Yesterday, 2:24 PM • Edison Investment Research•11 CommentsBox Runup And Insider Selling May Indicate Full ValuationBOX• Yesterday, 2:13 PM • Donovan Jones•6 CommentsCyberArk - A Summer Low Buy Before A Fall High?CYBR• Yesterday, 2:07 PM • Accendo Markets•2 CommentsIntel: Cloud Continues Strong Momentum, But Shareholders Will Not Be RewardedMBLY, NVDA• Yesterday, 1:45 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•10 CommentsAMD: The Good, The Bad, The VegaAMD• Yesterday, 12:58 PM • Austin Craig•228 CommentsRadisys: Time To Buy?RSYS• Yesterday, 12:26 PM • Mark Gomes•13 CommentsAMD: Threadripper Will DominateAMD• Yesterday, 12:18 PM • Kumquat Research•58 CommentsApple Delivering On Need To Complement iPhone SalesAAPL• Yesterday, 12:09 PM • Gary Bourgeault•21 CommentsNavient Acquires Duncan Solutions For Transportation Revenue ManagementNAVI• Yesterday, 11:35 AM • Donovan Jones•6 CommentsSemiconductor Equipment Stocks - What's Going On?AMAT, LRCX, KLAC• Yesterday, 11:13 AM • Robert Castellano•10 CommentsSilicon Motion Technology Is A BuySIMO• Yesterday, 10:57 AM • Shareholders Unite•3 CommentsFrontier: Get Out While You CanFTR• Yesterday, 10:35 AM • Quad 7 Capital•85 CommentsGarmin Ltd. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGRMN• Yesterday, 10:33 AM • SA TranscriptsS&P Index Decision Punishes Snap, But Helps Ordinary InvestorsSNAP• Yesterday, 10:19 AM • Ian Bezek•30 CommentsRedfin May Not Be Innovative Or Disruptive, Valuation In QuestionRDFN• Yesterday, 10:13 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•59 CommentsKemet Corporation 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKEM• Yesterday, 9:57 AM • SA TranscriptsSnatch Up Fitbit's Shares Ahead Of Its Earnings ReleaseFIT• Yesterday, 9:37 AM • Jeffrey Himelson•65 CommentsRotork: A Surprising Change To Make The Strong, Stronger?Editors' Pick • RTOXF• Yesterday, 9:11 AM • Dividend Drive•1 CommentInterXion Holding N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesINXN• Yesterday, 8:26 AM • SA TranscriptsDrill Baby Drill: Bri-Chem Earnings Preview And Forecast UpdateEditors' Pick • BRYFF• Yesterday, 6:48 AM • Darren McCammon•8 CommentsUnisys Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUIS• Yesterday, 3:20 AM • SA TranscriptsJuly 2017 Recap: Least Active July Since The Financial Crisis With 9 IPOsRDFN, APRN• Yesterday, 1:22 AM • Renaissance Capital IPO Research•1 CommentInvesting In AMDAMD• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:57 PM • Raymond Caron, Ph.D.•108 CommentsGlu Mobile Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGLUU• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:43 PM • SA TranscriptsCoherent, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCOHR• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:31 PM • SA TranscriptsZix Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesZIXI• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:14 PM • SA TranscriptsSnap Stock: Lockup Expiry Yet To Take EffectSNAP• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:18 PM • Amigobulls•34 CommentsLogMeIn Agrees To Acquire Nanorep For Virtual Assistant TechLOGM• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:04 PM • Donovan JonesAmazon: When Earnings Miss For The Right ReasonsAMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:52 PM • Josh Blechman•47 CommentsApple: End The BuybackAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:09 PM • Feria Investor•142 CommentsAmazon's AWS cloud platform is no match for AzureAMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:40 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•71 CommentsTwitter: Wait Wait WaitTWTR• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:29 PM • Celeritas Investments•36 CommentsApple First Look: Strength Across The BoardAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:24 PM • D.M. Martins Research•47 CommentsApple Earnings: No Worries HereAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:08 PM • Bill Maurer•78 CommentsDump Amazon Now?AMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:07 PM • Bill Gunderson•54 CommentsEVERTEC 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEVTC• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:48 PM • SA TranscriptsQuotient Technology Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesQUOT• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:46 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Missing 'M' In Facebook MessengerFB• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:44 PM • Karen Webster•23 CommentsRedfin: Disruptive Predator Or Sessile Bottom Feeder?RDFN• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:24 PM • The Capitalist Pig•13 CommentsSequans Communications 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSQNS• Tue, Aug. 1, 3:09 PM • SA TranscriptsReversal Of Fortune Ahead For Facebook?FB• Tue, Aug. 1, 3:05 PM • Gary Bourgeault•16 CommentsTwitter's New Plan To Drive Growth Could BackfireTWTR• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:55 PM • Amigobulls•12 CommentsNokia: Slow And Steady, No Need To Buckle UpNOK• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:47 PM • D.M. Martins Research•24 Comments123456...1166Next Page










UNI-PIXEL INC. quote - Product overview - NASDAQ Stocks 















 










 
Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds.














     















Deutsch





español





suomi





français





italiano





Nederlands





português





русский





svenska





中文









Member's area



Login
Sign up
FAQ



















 Stock exchange


All Stocks


Euronext Stocks


US NASDAQ Stocks


US NYSE Stocks


US Tech 150


US NonTech 200


UK Stocks


UK AIM


UK 300


UK 200


 Indices


All indices


Europe Indices


NASDAQ COMPOSITE


DOW JONES INDUSTRIAL


S&P500


FTSE 100


NIKKEI 225


EURO STOXX 50


CAC40


DAX30


IBEX 35


FTSE MIB 40


 Forex


All currency pairs


Forex (47 main pairs)


Forex (128 currency pairs)


AUD currency pairs


CAD currency pairs


CHF currency pairs


EUR currency pairs


GBP currency pairs


JPY currency pairs


NZD currency pairs


USD currency pairs


 Commodities


All commodities


Gold (XAUUSD)


Silver (XAGUSD)


BRENT & WTI CRUDE OIL


Ranking


Products ranking


Traders ranking


Need technical analysis?


Technical analysis request


All technical analysis







 Stock exchange


Euronext Stocks


US NASDAQ Stocks


US NYSE Stocks


US NYSE Market 50


US NonTech 200


UK Stocks


UK AIM


UK 300


UK 200


 Indices


Major stock indices


Europe Indices


Indices Futures


Sector indices


United States


France


Germany


Spain


Italy


Netherlands


 Forex


128 currency pairs


AUD currency pairs


CAD currency pairs


CHF currency pairs


EUR currency pairs


GBP currency pairs


JPY currency pairs


NZD currency pairs


USD currency pairs


 Commodities


All commodities







 Stock exchange


All Stocks


Euronext Stocks


US NASDAQ Stocks


US NYSE Stocks


US Tech 150


US NonTech 200


UK Stocks


UK AIM


UK 300


UK 200


 Indices


All indices


Europe Indices


NASDAQ COMPOSITE


DOW JONES INDUSTRIAL


S&P500


FTSE 100


NIKKEI 225


EURO STOXX 50


CAC40


DAX30


IBEX 35


FTSE MIB 40


 Forex


All currency pairs


Forex (47 main pairs)


Forex (128 currency pairs)


AUD currency pairs


CAD currency pairs


CHF currency pairs


EUR currency pairs


GBP currency pairs


JPY currency pairs


NZD currency pairs


USD currency pairs


EUR/USD


USD/JPY


 Commodities


All commodities


Other categories


Economic news


Political news


Financial markets


Global news







 Groups


Active Groups


Popular groups


New Groups


Groups Forum


 Forum


Main Forum


Stocks Forum


Indices Forum


Forex Forum


Commodities Forum


 Social Networks


CentralCharts Twitter


 Widgets & Services


Centralcharts' widget






 
 





Number of analysis



Number of traders



Since last analysis


 
Find a Product / Trader / Group :


Narrow your search...

Stocks
Forex
Indices
Commodities

Warrants
Bonds
ETF
Futures


Traders
Groups














 


















 



UNI-PIXEL INC. 





OverviewQuotesChartNewsAnalysisWarrantsProfileWallForum 


 




-
 USD				
(-)

  15 min delay - NASDAQ Stocks 










Open:
-


Change:
-


Volume:
-










Low:
-


High:
-


High / Low range:
-








Type:
Stocks


Ticker:
UNXL


ISIN:

 
















Overview


Quotes


Chart


News


Analysis


Warrants


Profile


Wall


Forum














 






UNI-PIXEL INC. overview



5 days quotes  15 min delay - NASDAQ Stocks



07/28/201707/31/201708/01/201708/02/201708/03/2017
 


Last0.3770.3790.3760.3590.320


Change (%)-0.76%+0.50%-0.79%-4.52%-10.86%


Volume448,820174,935274,407991,438909,702







5 days change : -15.79%






						UNI-PIXEL INC. - More quotes...
Lastest analysis



No technical analysis



Lastest news



UniPixel Sets Second Quarter Fiscal Year 2017 Conference Call for Thursday, August 10, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET 



UniPixel Consolidates R&D and Operations; Streamlines Company for Flexibility and Cost Savings 



UniPixel and GIS Execute Agreement for Joint Development of Touch Sensors for Flexible Display 



UniPixel Management and Directors Acquire Shares in the Open Market 



UniPixel, Inc. Recesses Annual Meeting Until May 23, 2017 










			Uni-Pixel        



 
19

0








			Uni-Pixel        



 
7

0



								UNI-PIXEL INC. - More news...

Lastest discussions



No discussion












Follow this product



Post an Analysis




Request an analysis





							Add to a list						


Technical analysis requests

No technical analysis requests
See all analysis requests 



Statistics


Analysis							:0 
Follower(s) :0 




Currently on this Wall



Join these members now



				Activity on				UNI-PIXEL INC.			





 





 










 





About - UniPixel
















































open





Blog
News
Contact
 













XTouch Sensor
Diamond Guard Resin
Investors
About

Board of Directors
Management Team
Patents
Careers


 





 











top mask





About UniPixel
UniPixel, Inc. (NASDAQ: UNXL) makes innovative performance-engineered films that enhance and protect touchscreen and flexible electronics products. We give our customers a competitive advantage by helping them make new touchscreen devices that are thinner, lighter, more durable, and less expensive.
Read more about our XTouch touch panel sensors, and Diamond Guard cover glass replacement and protective cover film applications.


What Can We Do for You?
Contact UniPixel to find out how we can help you enhance your next product with a cost-effective, custom-designed touch sensor or lightweight, flexible protective coating.


In-House Design & Manufacturing
Our customers count on UniPixel to deliver the latest touch sensor and hard coat technologies to meet their budget and schedule requirements. We help reduce the complexity, cost, and risk of sourcing touchscreen and hard coat technologies while providing value-added innovation and support.
Read more about our design and manufacturing capabilities. 


Patents
UniPixel has 16 issued patents and 58 patent applications covering key technology areas.


















 





XTouch Sensors - UniPixel
















































open





Blog
News
Contact
 













XTouch Sensor
Diamond Guard Resin
Investors
About

Board of Directors
Management Team
Patents
Careers


 





 











top mask





XTouch SensorsOpen a new world of possibilities for your innovative touch-based products with UniPixel’s highly flexible XTouch sensor film. XTouch sensors support narrow borders, curved surfaces, and even edgeless designs, all with thinner sensor stacks and improved linearity and reliability. Our alternative to traditional touch sensors lets you turn your unique touch-based concept into a functional design at a lower total system cost than legacy technologies.
So go ahead and innovate.
We’ll help you create sleek, edgeless, lightweight smartphones, tablets, notebook PCs, and 2-in-1s. And we’ll give you unlimited potential for exciting new consumer, industrial, and automotive applications. All with engaging touch interfaces and the competitive advantage of lower cost and higher performance.


XTouch Advantages
Wrap flexible sensors around curved surfaces to create unique touch-based products with exceptional optical clarity.
Get better noise immunity and lower power consumption via very low sheet resistance.
Create larger active screen areas with narrow borders that maximize the touchscreen’s surface.
Experience improved device reliability and reduced material cost with our narrow bond area.
Offer a richer user experience with support for both active and passive stylus interaction.
Deliver improved touch accuracy and stylus performance at lower total system cost.



XTouch Specifications
Film Specification: 50µm optically clear PET film
Sensor Metallization: Copper, secondary metal plating
Sensor Format: Double sided (1 film; both sides)
Touch Module Transmission: 90% (typical)
Adhesion: Passes 3M600 tape peel adhesion test
Operating Temperature: 0°C to +70°C
Mesh Sheet Resistance: <10 ohm/sq.








XTouch Sensor 
ApplicationsXTouch sensor performance opens doors for new and innovative product applications across multiple market segments. XTouch is ideal for any application that requires a highly responsive and accurate touch interface that is thinner, lighter, and more cost-effective than legacy technologies.





Ideal Applications
Mobile phones2-in-1sCamerasTabletsPrintersNavigation devicesLaptops/notebookse-ReadersPoint-of-sale (POS) devices 

Markets
AutomotiveIndustrialAppliancesCommercialMedicalConsumer Games 






XTouch Manufacturing 
 ProcessXUniPixel’s roll-to-roll manufacturing process improves yield and productivity compared to complex ITO film and glass processes, while creating complex microstructures that outperform ITO and new alternative transparent conductive coatings. This is a streamlined alternative to traditional complicated Glass-Film-Film (GFF), Glass-Glass (GG) and One Glass Solution (OGS) projected capacitive manufacturing processes.











Touch Panel 
Integration PartnerFinished XTouch sensors are delivered to our downstream touch panel integration partners as finished rolls or cut sheets.































Design & Manufacturing SupportUniPixel offers comprehensive technical and commercial support, from design inception to module integration and manufacturing within your supply chain. Our engineers work with you to create a design that ideally meets your requirements. Then we support the touch module integration process to ensure world-class quality at a competitive cost.




UniPixel works closely with a wide range of industry partners to support your specific needs:
Module integrators
Original equipment manufacturers (OEMs)
Original design manufacturers (ODMs)
Touch controller providers
















